We went to dinner with P’Dacha (?) and P’Om last night. P’Dacha is
Lee Harvey Oswald. 500 to 1
His expression changed as he looked at me and I knew he remembered our rocky past. My heart leapt into my throat. This was not the face of a man happy to see an old chum.
Hopefully not just yet.
- One entry per person (unless you use a Little Miss Muffet Stamps image)
We wish to acknowledge that without the work of these incredible filmmakers, and music producers it would not have been possible for Awakening As One to share its message of Peace and Unity with such beauty, heart and soul.
Prim Blessings,
All you have to do is take one pad, and lightly rub in circular motions over cleansed skin. You’ll feel your skin being exfoliated, and you can even see some of the dead skin, or leftover makeup, being swept right out onto the pad! You’ll want to focus on the areas that you have any dry patches or flaky skin.
“No.” I said, “Not yet.”
'Which are?' asked the Blonde.
Wobbly bits – well I have definitely become wobblier recently. I guess I am in my healthy weight range, but my tummy has always bothered me, particularly after having children. I have recently noticed that my bum is joining in though and that is not on!! I disagree with using weight as a measurement of getting slimmer so I really want to focus on how I look and feel. Saying that I did weigh myself this morning for the first time in months – and that was really because I know that most people associate with this, and would probably want to know how much I weigh at the start of my getting-toned journey. So my current weight is 9 stone and half a pound. I know that probably sounds small to lots of people, but I am only 4 foot 11 inches tall and every pound shows on my face and tummy (and now bum!!). So as I said I want to reduce wobbliness and at the same time gain energy and vitality. I have no goal weight or dress size – I just want to feel happy in a bikini in the summer and be able to jump around as much as my heart desires…oh and of course live as long as possible in a fit and strong body.
Tactics
How much of a demonstration (or a ‘show’ – now – my life?) is needed?
Mix the dry ingredients together in a large bowl. Mix the wet ingredients together in another bowl. Add the wet to the dry and stir (fold the wet into the dry). The batter will be lumpy. Add fruit if desired or whatever else you want, such as chocolate chips or chopped nuts. Fill each muffin cup about 2/3 full. Bake at 400 degrees for 20 to 25 minutes. The recipe makes 12 muffins.
I know the 365 is now over, but I STILL give you all BIG baking hugs and muffins!! xoxoxox
Could never reach our destiny.
11. Adagio – Allegro 8:52
Boneless chicken- 500 gms (I used chicken thighs)
“Many women put off having a child in the wake of The Great Recession,” Wilcox says. “Now, we think more women and couples have decided to go ahead and have a child—especially that second or third child that they put off at the height of the recession.”
Once they see my new glasses, they are going to feel all kinds of guilt and remorse for tormenting me so much.
I really enjoyed the effect although it wasn't "magical" per se. All of these top coats applied beautifully, dried quickly and with a matte finish. They crack very well and I was impressed that they will still crack even if you apply lightly over an already cracked area. I don't like that this looks like black crackle, I wish it was clearer that this was purple, green, etc. crackle as well as show the tint. I do understand that it's not possible considering what it is you get. Just shooting an idea out there!
Or about a newborn who had to fight for his life for weeks in the neonatal care, because some visiting relative had forced a pinch of sugar into his mouth which had some bacteria?
2 Tbsp. cornstarch
1 Astronomy Domine
The Esk river is more of a stream than a river here and, for quite a lot of its length, takes the form of pleasantly rocky bathing pools linked by waterfalls. Next time I visit I'll take a towel. As it was, we were restricted to the banks. Much to our amazement -and amusement- as we walked up the valley, we kept running into a group of four young men dressed in helmets, T shirts and wetsuits who were swimming, gill-scrambling and tombstoning their way up the river. They were good-natured lot. They had something of a "Three Men in a Boat" aura about them (well, four in this case, and no boat) that made one feel as good to be alive as they evidently did. It's easy to be a Jeremiah where tombstoning is concerned. The Jeremiahs in this case may be right: speaking for myself, I definitely lack the nerve for it, and don't relish the idea of swapping in a split second a life spent swimming in rivers for one spent in a wheelchair. If nothing else though, these guys certainly made a good case for the importance of having fun.
Dutch Crunch Topping: 15 minutes active time, 15 minutes passive time
A decision by the new owners of Cooley Distillery not to supply whiskey to independent operators has been slammed as "anti-competitive" by Slane Castle owner Lord Henry Mountcharles.
roll out into a rectangle (about 10x12)
Supposedly, the movie will do more than just scare the pants off of you. Scott has stated that the film explores the creation and beginning of humanity. While I already have my opinions on the matter of creation (ones that I may share someday if any interest is shown) and it is very doubtful that my opinions will be swayed, it should be interesting to see what concepts are brought forth in the movie.
Actor, Sp: Joanne Woodward
I am looking so forward to tomorrow as all of my sons will be here for dinner. We are having a wonderful tri-tip and garlic potatoes. YUM..... I am sure we will spend time in conversation "discussing" all the "mistakes" they all endured through their childhoods, haha, and the hopefully the joys as well.
Wow, so that all leads up to the check out. The single worst moment for a child in life. I remember, it was the worst. And of course the stores do a great job at making sure they make it a living nightmare for any parent in this situation. Will all the snacks in grabbing distance, and not enough room to fit all the groceries in the baggage carousel. What could be a 5 minute process turns into a 15 minute process. Then to top it all off watching your oldest slap your youngest in the face for fun, and having other people around watching you. What do you do? Do you slap him back? Not in 2011… Jail doesn’t seem like a good option to me. So you take him out and you hold his hand tight enough so he can’t escape. Well guess what your child will almost always make you feel like an abusive parent. Dad your hurtinn me…. let go… your hurtinn me. Even though you know the only reason it hurts them is because they are trying to escape to run to whatever mischief they can get into.
Last time at 10 weeks almost 11 weeks I went into the ER with heavy bright red bleeding. I was freaking out thinking I had lost the baby and when I had an ultrasound done I was so relieved that baby was still in there moving all over the place. I was told I had a threatened miscarriage. I was discharged and went on like normal, wasn't put on any kind of bed rest, the next day i went to work and took and advancement exam.
09 - Dreams I'll Never See 08:42
$998.00 + Shipping
depress me.
Brew Day Photos:
The word Church comes from the greek word Ekklesia, which means “assembly” or “gathering”. In Acts the original name for what is now the Church was The Way. But as the people of God, eventually called “Christians”, (“little Christ’s) began to gather daily and weekly, they referred to their gathering as a church (Makes sense). Eventually “church” replaced the title “The Way”. And now Church means much more than “gathering” It means an institution, a building, a place, a group. It doesn’t help to deconstruct the word and make our own definition. We can roll with today’s vernacular. But just know that when the coming Keene Church hears the word Church my hope as that Church’s pastor is that they will think first and foremost of the gathered people of God for the purpose of worship, whether they gather in Small Groups (House Church) or as a large Sunday Morning Gathering, not a building or an institution. My hope also is that their defininition of church doesn’t go beyond the fellow believers with whome they gather. So that as the individual House Churches gather throughout the week are part of one church, so individual gatherings that gather in Christ on Sunday Morning are part of the one greater Church of Keene, which are part of the one greater church of the whole world. Every believer is a brother or sister. Christ has one bride. She is called the Church. And she loves to gather in the name of Jesus Christ.
Reviewer: Christopher Wadlow (Professor of Law, UEA Law School, University of East Anglia, Norwich, England)
If this had happened 2 days earlier, we probably would have all driven up to Nebraska with my parents straight from Tennessee. The kids are sad, but they all (except the youngest two) got to visit her within the past few weeks during their visit.
Whatever you think the ‘truth’ may be. Whatever you believe the ‘situation’ to be. These things are just the constructs of your mind. Your perceived reality.
Speaking of doing things now and not waiting, I went mountain biking for the first time this month... what have I been waiting for?? This picture is me at the top of a big hill (at over 8000 ft above sea level no less)!
I love peaceful mornings of the weekend. No kids fighting over who gets to bathe first, no need to check out kids not forgetting to bring their homeworks or projects, no need to prepare kids' lunch boxes in such a hurry...
Any yes...I can't forget my moose!! I attended a seminar given by Anchorage, AK Chamber of Commerce. He is a thank you gift for attending.
Spellman Files series by Lisa Lutz--read 3 out of 5 (series ongoing?) A woman named Isabel deals with her family of San Francisco private investigators.
There are always ghosts in Savannah but this time of year is perfect for a ghost tour. Pick your poison: go on a walking tour, a haunted trolley, in a hearse and if you're really brave, go on the All Hallows Eve Paranormal Hunt of the Dead tour.
The Snorers Wife will lie in the darkness and wonder if perhaps the couch may not be a better option, sure she'll be cold and wake up with a crink in her neck which will require fifty or more visits to the chiropractor to sort out, but really, what price does one put on a good nights sleep ?
I don’t know how well I fulfilled this requirement:
1 unmarried
All the beers were exemplary but two must be given special mention as the stand out beers of the evening. The Kernel Saison was an outstanding representation of this style of beer with a big, big nose full of fresh, sweet summer citrus notes of oranges, tangerines, clementines and lemon zest with Belgian yeasty breadiness, super smooth mouthfeel and a dryish fruity finish. It was lovely. I hear the bottle version is even better than the keg. I made a point of picking up a couple of bottles of the Saison to check out that theory. I look forward to letting you know.
Let me introduce you to the Filarial Worm (Wuchereria bancrofti). These worms are tiny, round, thread-like parasites that travel from human to human via the mosquito, the buzzing, flitting insect angel of death and pestilence.
Last Friday my mom and I went shopping. Lets just say I scored in the shoe department. :) We went to a thrift store and I got some awesome looking shoes. They are so comfortable and they were $5 + 50% off = $2.50!!! The nude heels we found at JCPenny's. I had been looking for shoes like them for my brothers wedding in July. :) I got the sandals from Payless and they are amazingly comfortable. I think it was a very successful trip. :)
there for too long. Because
The kitchen was by now firing up and the smells were lovely. Unfortunately, I only had money enough for beer and could only watch the plates of delicious looking meats and vegetables pass me by. I could have perhaps asked the midget in the kitchen if I could have a 'little something', off the books. He may not be able to see what he's cooking, but what he cooks turns out pretty good.
3. book keeping (I own a business people, this is no joke!)
“Why don’t we follow each subject as she goes about her daily life? That way
Five lame-ass zings
If everyone started their day with yoga — even for just 10 minutes — there would be less car accidents, less stress, less misunderstandings and less disappointments. There would be more positivity, more productivity and certainly much more love!
No..... they're not Gudrun, leather with spiffy flowers..... but price $0.00. Satisfaction of renewing something old into something new and fun..... priceless (well, maybe not priceless... but it sure beats spending $190.00!).
Hurricane Katrina tossed the ideal right out the window. In addition to suffering a tremendous family disappointment, we are facing insurance and other hassles, worrying about money, living in somebody else’s house, sharing said house with 8 members of our extended family (for a total of twelve people), trying to find what we need in an unfamiliar town, and feeling completely removed from the resources we usually rely on. Add into that our concern for our relatives and other residents of the Gulf coast who’ve lost so much more than we have, and I’m sure you can see that we are unschooling in less than ideal circumstances right now.
Well you can do anything but lay off of my blue suede shoes”…
Not all of the changes will be immediately apparent to BlackBerry users — in fact, one such improvement is meant to be all but invisible to people pecking out their day’s messages. Bhardwaj revealed to us that there is in essence a second, invisible keyboard that conforms over time to how a user types.
What occurred recently was that I received a request from the the BNP asking permission to re-publish some of my previous articles. As it has always been my policy to allow any Nationalist site to use my work if it furthers the Nationalist cause, I agreed to their request.
The new dual action DC plug is composed of a dual car charger splitter that allows you to power 2 mobile phones all at the same time in your car. All you need to do is plug the power adapter into your power socket and it’s set and ready to use. This is truly beneficial if you have more than 1 mobile phone in your car.
By hosting a KaBOOM! Play Day, you will not only ensure children in your community get out and play for an afternoon, but you can help make your local park or playground an inviting place, where families can spend time together for years to come. — Your friends a KaBoom!
Others like steps.
After considering her strengths she decided not to continue.
But when evening comes around and it's time to
The good news is that NJFL is willing to let middle school kids earn college points by converting 10% of it to NFL points. For example, 100 NJFL points = 10 NFL college points.
At all of the scientific evidence surely mounting
5.) If you find a tradition that you trust, generally speaking you can trust its initiates, which is important because you don’t have to vet them. You’re not walking into a situation with someone that you don’t know at all. It essentially gives you a qualified clergy. In Paganism, we don’t have a central authority. For example, in the Catholic world, the Pope is the head of the church and oversees all church issues. If something is going wrong (technically speaking), the pope has dominion over dealing with it. In Paganism, you don’t really have that, so how can you figure out if a priest or priestess is a good one? This is not to say that bad apples don’t pop up, but…it’s at least a little less likely.
This time it's different, though. These people are experts.
“They only live if you do eat them? Your sons, the Skittles?”
that you are back
I get a lot out of the social side of tango. Once, for a brief period, I even got a personal enemy, the only one I've ever had as far as I'm aware. Since all I had done to offend her was get invited somewhere because I danced relatively well, I treasured her. The look she gave me that said "what are you doing here?" was pure gold, and if am fortunate enough to keep my faculties, it will give me joy, moral and social instruction, and innocent amusement to the day I die. (Her attempt at revenge was successful as far as it went, but so lacking in ambition that I really couldn't grudge it.)
This is not about race. This is not about a white on black crime. This is not about the epidemic of black on black or Latino on Latino or White on White crime. This is simply a matter of whether or not justice was served. Did the Sanford police insure that justice was served?
Before we announce the Ninth challenge we need to announce the winner of the Eight challenge "Ribbon and Lace"
Besides being written with rapier wit and impeccable detail, the author also gives solutions for the ciphers Enola faces so that the reader can solve along with her. I know, I know, I ought to have gotten over the thrill of that sort of book back in fifth grade, but honestly, once you've gotten a taste of the detective life, you can never go back to the same dry "and then he solved the case" texts again.
-rw-r–r– 1 root root 3074 Aug 18 2004 system.prev
“If not you, no one,” the magician answered. “You are my last chance.” “
If we use electric vehicle oil use will reduce. Oil companies don’t like this. They are lobbying against any research and use of better technologies.
The Jurkis Bill as it’s known is a multi-pronged approach to revamping the state’s public toilets and changing the way citizens move their bowels outside their homes. Research and development plays a major part in the public-porcelain proposal. High up on the Jurkis hit list are disposable toilet seat covers. The bill describes the current paper variety as “highly inefficient, downright dangerous and goddammed disgusting.” Jurkis’ street team has helped induce a groundswell of discontent over Kimberly Clark’s staple product. An anonymous Circle K shopper sounded off on the effectiveness of the veil-thin potty rings, “What the hell is that thing made of, anyway? That’s the same crap my wife uses to stuff gift bags with! My kid traces comics through that same shit. Paper don’t stop no damned syphilis! Hell, I could go outside and rig me up a wreath from twigs and leaves, sit on the damned thing and feel more safer-er!”
Self confidence. Friendship. Support. Encouragement. Community.
Ever year the Girls from Neptune doll club do a Christmas Swap this year Stephanie picked up tiny Bear kits from AC moore .I think they were all of a buck fifty
I love this season of the biggest loser because they are going by the theme of no excuses. They tackle every excuse. The biggest one I hear is, I dont have time. Guess what? No, you dont. You wont have anytime left if you dont start moving, today. I have a dear friend, Karin, who is a working mom of 2, who's lost well over 100lbs ON HER OWN. Amy, is another, working mom, who has lost over 75lbs. Go make the time to get healthy, and fight for MORE time with your loved ones.
Don't do this. It sounds like one of those wretched campaign ads "My name is Grover Cleveland and I approved this ad" Just sign your name and your contact info at the bottom of the email.
“Did you bring the note?” came a voice from the darkness.
A quick and dirty post about a quick and dirty recipe.
The purpose of the Church is not to create healthy civilizations, nor does the Church exist to be yet one more outlet of good feelings and neuroses. The Church is that place where God is being reconciled to man, and man to God. It is that place where all things are being gathered together in one in Christ Jesus. It is the ecclesia, the Divine Community of the Body of Christ, in which we may be made whole and in which the truth of our existence can be made manifest.
(Henry Holt and Company)
the ex-hustlers- iago's coat; stella in need
199 4. “Law and Literature and Common Sense.” Book Review: Robert E. Rodes, Jr., Law and Literature (Notre Dame, Indiana: 1986). Review of Politics, vol. 48, pp. 472-76 (Summer 1986).
Oh, and did I mention that my parents are flying in tomorrow morning to watch Addie while we're at the hospital and help around the house for a few days? Yeah, they are.
the planet supports only me,
Totally delirious in my feverish condition, I made it to morning, no closer to a Key West sunset than I was the day before.
After two weeks of eating with the suggested menus, we came to a stage of what the program called a “cheat-day period”. In these 3-day cheat period, we were allowed to eat any food we wish (no more suggested menus from the program) even junk food!
Last year we got rides to and from the shuttle pick-up point thanks to the kindness of strangers. This year, too. Show cowboy John Hustead gave us a ride there in his pickup truck and Agua Dulce residents Paul and Carrie Riley gave us a lift back. Thanks, kind strangers who are now friends!
Satan is very close to his goal. And that brings up the whole issue if it is possible to actually clone a beer. Can I--as a mediocre homebrewer with improvised equipment, a different procedure and different grains--actually clone a beer? As much as I like The Jamil Show on the the brewing network, I have to say no. I might get close. Very close, in fact. But it won't be the same beer.
But this will come after the dancing in the streets.
I dip all my eggs in Ghirardelli chocolate that I buy in disk shapes that I find at my local candy supply store.
It's been a while since I did a REAL post. That's because I've been crazy around here getting ready to get into my new space at The Modern Cottage Company's Vintage Market. SO crazy!
From Bluff: Travel west on hwy 191 (this road becomes hwy 163 about 4 miles west of Bluff) for about 5 miles and turn right (north) onto Co Rd 262 (Butler Wash Rd) After passing through a gate near the highway, drive 1 mile and then turn left (west) onto a single track road. You can park here or continue on .2 miles to a parking area at the rim of the canyon.
In the second part of Chapter Seven, Romney discusses in-depth his plan to force-down medical costs, something that he notes was beyond the scope of the Mass plan. Romney describes some popular proposals – electronic records, on-line reporting re: prices and quality (so-called transparency), and malpractice reform – but concludes that they are not enough. Real change will require bringing the free-market to health care. Currently, health care has a multitude of incentives for over-treatment or over-use (he refers to the New Yorker article comparing costs and treatment in El Paso vs. McAllen), and Romney wants to see incentives (such as co-pays and deductibles) that discourage unnecessary visits and treatments. (Incidentally, this is why ObamaCare is trying to tax Cadillac plans to death, but labor unions deferred the tax until 2018.) Romney wants to shift toward consumer, doctor, and hospital incentives, such as paying doctors for the quality of their work instead of the quantity of their work. Romney is not hopeful re: managed care (HMOs) because top-down controls don’t work like bottom-up incentives.
Now, I would like to present to you my final MMDT card.....A tribute to Priscilla and the team.... I used Priscilla's digi birds and some Martha Stewart punched butterflies to gracefully flutter around this lovely friendship poem that expresses what I feel for my DT sisters and family. I hope you enjoy my creation and that you will consider giving this sketch a try as well. I would love to come visit you and see your interpretation of this week's sketch.
Atwood’s sound is rootsy with a hint of blues, but with a melodic sense that is more contemporary. Atwood studied classical guitar at the San Francisco Conservatory and has been called gregarious and open with a powerful voice contrasted yet complimented by his instrument of choice, guitar, resonator guitar or piano. Rare is it that we find an artist who can deliver this type of emotionality. His writing and his persona seem to come from a soul that is old; making it so when you look at this talented young artist, it makes you wonder if he hasn’t experienced a previous life. Atwood is a Damariscotta, Maine native who migrated south to explore the music that inspired him. He now resides in Asheville, NC and finds the area supportive and inspirational for him as a songwriter.
in the Zumba disc and play it on the Wii. It's been
It can be tempting as writers to start wanting to turn things into a crusade. You think that you need to improve your concentration and go on a huge trawl for any and all techniques to do so. Yet in doing this you are actually turning it into a mission. This can work but sometimes it’s better just to keep the changes to a minimum. Tell yourself you’re just going to get a puzzle book and do the odd one from time to time and you’ve done something to improve your concentration without it become a dominant direction in your mindset.
the heart of God.
Anyway, the sheet this month was all about perseverance. I made a joke with myself as I rode saying Sir Perservance, which reminded me of Sir Percivil from Bob the Builder, and PerSERVEance, which I tried to make into something meaningful, but I couldn’t manage. One of the questions on this worksheet was:
The overview of the "Visitor" tab tells you the total number of visitors over a period of one month, however if you look closer there is so much more to see. Absolute Unique visitors are the total number of first time visits which are calculated as a percentage of the total. In the case of my hypothetical blog there are 733 visits (total) and 344 Unique; this equates to 41.4% new visits for the period. The visitor to this blog spent on average of 3.42 minutes on the site (reading) and 2.19 average page views. What this tells the Blogger is that their subject matter is interesting enough for the visitor to continue beyond the landing page. In this example there are 1608 total page views. The number that is the best indicator over time is the number of Unique Visitors because as that number increases (and bounce rate decreases) it tells the author that their blog is becoming increasingly more popular. If the average minutes on the site increases the bounce rate will decrease correspondingly.
Natalya won second prize in the Houston Grand Opera's Eleanor McCollum Competition earlier this year, and although there's no video from last night's Ferrier final, there is a sample from Houston: 'Comè scoglio' from Così fan tutte, no small order for any soprano at any time. Brava, Natalya! We look forward to loving your voice for many happy years.
05. The Brave
sometimes i wonder. i don't think i'm very normal. to me it makes absolute and perfect sense. but i can see the looks of confused and worried faces of the kind souls reading this blog. i can feel their pity. and i can sense their pleas for the words to say. i don't remember what it was like to feel normal. i don't even know what is normal.
This super easy and cute organizer is so simple - and you can make it any style, shape, size that suits your needs. I made this cover for the Frosted Designs challenge o use a transparency on your project. I hope you can head on over and take a look!!
I shall build up my strength in union with The Lord and by means of His mighty power, putting on all the armour that God has given me, so that I will be able to stand up against the devil’s evil tricks. So I stand ready, with Truth as a belt right round my waist, with Righteousness as my breastplate, and as my shoes the readiness to announce the Good News of Peace. At all times carrying Faith as a shield; for with it I will be able to put out all the burning arrows shot by the evil one. And I shall accept Salvation as a helmet, and the Word of God as the sword which The Spirit has given me, to God’s glory in Christ Jesus! Amen!
Here's the first, a frame that I made using some of the powders and one of my fav techniques...
The heightened focus on psychedelics can be attributed to contemporary research which validates the therapeutic benefits of administering psychedelic drugs in unison with psychotherapy, when other conventional treatments fail. Further support of psychedelics has been garnered because of transparency and applied ethical standards to the research methods being used.
Not in a million years would I, could I have foreseen this ability and the way it provides for every need of my life. Both financially and emotionally!
Although the year has had some low points, there have been really special times too. Like photographing some of the spring festivals in the Dandenong Ranges, near Melbourne, Victoria. Adding colour to my life was certainly uplifting. I particularly enjoyed tip toeing through the tulips and eating my way through a scrumptious plate of little Dutch pancakes.
–Character creation is meh – all characters look too “pretty”.
counterpart. Plateau State’s
Habby Anniversary, Ya'all!
Now, today, May 4, 2012, we have The Avengers in theaters – Iron Man, Hulk (played by another of my favorites, Mark Ruffalo), Thor, Captain America, Black Widow (Scarlett Johansson), and Hawkeye (Jeremy Renner).
Back to the song. I'm a huge XTC fan. I think they were one of the greatest groups to not only step out of Swindon but from anywhere on the planet. It would seem we now have to use the past tense when talking about them as Andy and Colin definitely appear to have fallen out for good. It's a shame but they made some brilliant music along the way. Having said all of that, I very nearly posted Tricky's version of 'Dear God', which can be found on his album, Vulnerable (2003). The Bristol boy really brings yet another dimension to the song, with vocals by Costanza accompanying the Trickster's regular growl and wheeze. Oh alright, here it is:
Sacrifices for an oblivious, unblinking pair of eyes
Jon Lee & Gerry Brown for Keytone from 1973.
Bring water to a boil. Add the eggs and bring back to a boil. Once the water is boiling, reduce it to a simmer. Cook for a total of five minutes for large eggs. Remove eggs from the pot and add to ice cold water. Once the eggs are cool enough to hold, crack open with a knife, and scoop the egg out of the shell. Sprinkle with salt and pepper to taste.
I did a test exercise last week, putting the same post simultaneously into the blog and into Google Plus. This was a couple of days after Google announced its algorithm change and it is perhaps premature to expect it to compete with a blog stuffed full of eDiscovery related keywords with five years’ worth of indexed content. The test piece was headed Guidance Software Webinar – Migrating to the Cloud: Navigating the eDiscovery Challenges. When I last looked (using Google.com) for the search string guidance software cloud webinar the top two hits were from Guidance’s sites, my blog entry was third and the Google+ post was nowhere. As at today, my blog post is top and the Google Plus post is the second entry on page 2.
All my patterns include full size pattern pieces and following my Sew Little Fabric motto, I make sure to not over estimate fabric! I hope you love them as much as I do!
So I answer the phone, and of course the more I need to write the more trivial the call will be - and the harder it will be to get the caller off the phone and me back into the Zone.
I found Eddy on the Australian MonkeyGarage forum where he had posted pictures of the actual built, explaining how he modified the frame, made his own seat, custom handlebars and exhaustpipe using oddball parts like old bicycle handlebars..
I have been busy doing what I love, being with my Friends and Family, Home Brewing, #gents, Disc Golf and sneaking in a full work week between it all. Needless to say I have ignored the Blog. I will be posting up so new recipes and beer reviews.
The wild-card character must be the last character in the App ID string. Example App IDs for this situation could be: R2T24EVAEE.com.domainname.* or R2T24EVAEE.*
Legend of the blues Pete Frampton teams up with his Escape Committee and returns to the Full Moon with a bunch of rock/blues tones and the ability to make a guitar sing like no other. Entry is free before 9:30pm and £2 thereafter.
Has your partner ever stolen from you? Or run up debts for you to handle?
The Council of the American Association for the Advancement of Science has thought it advisable to take formal steps upon this matter, in order that there may be no ground for misunderstanding of the attitude of this Association, which is one of the largest scientific bodies in the world, with a membership of more than 11,000 persons, including the American authorities in all branches of science. The following statements represent the position of the Council with regard to the theory of evolution.
My last patient turned out to be the most interesting. She was 90 year old woman whose health had been declining over the past month. She came to us for severe abdominal pain. Her blood pressure was low and her heart rate was high indicating a severe infection and or dehydration. I decided to put in an IV and gave her a liter of saline plus IV antibiotics to cover a urinary infection. We rechecked her blood pressure and heart rat after the treatment and it had normalized. I think there may have been something more serious going on but I did not have all the resources I needed to make the diagnosis. Fortunately, that does not happen to often.
Enter Bjorn Lomborg. Lomborg is not a denier, but he is a denialist hero, because he gave them their one really strong argument for doing nothing or next to nothing. Global warming is happening, he says, and it’s a problem, but it’s not a BIG problem and certainly not so big that we have to ditch our way of life. The reason this is a strong argument is that it doesn’t make the mistake of denying the science — futile, as Lomborg knows and as I hope you do by now — it just says that the outcome may not be that bad. Scientists can’t say he’s wrong because the future of a complex system — climate combined with human civilisation — is inherently unpredictable.
On the whole I have felt pretty good, excepting a very painful knee on Wednesday night which meant no running then.
Krewe of Iris: The oldest and biggest all-female krewe in New Orleans proper, originated in 1917, and parading since 1959.
Are you tired of trying diets that don't work. You get the weight off but as soon as you get done doing it you put the weight back on. With Herbalife you start these products to lose weight and gain energy but after you hit your goal weight (which you will with consistency) you will want to continue because they make you feel that good.
Iron Lion
In Canada, the Indian Act (passed in 1876) governs who is officially a native and who is not. Whereas most native tribes are matrilineal, until recently, the Canadian government considered only whether the father is native in determining a person’s status.
I always see them at over 6000yen in used shops even they are super seedy.. !
“And we know that God causes all things to work together for good to those who love God, to those who are called according to His purpose.
But for me and the very non-agrarian pursuits I have intended for my old Harley Springer, the sign I’ve been waiting for is that lone cypress tree’s leaves.
Just integrate these two pics… (OK, I know that first pic tells everything, but in second pic Prince’s glare is totally like G-Dragon’s. And in first one, Prince’s expression is the same as G-Dragon’s. So just integreate these too) And…is it just me or Prince and G-Dragon is the same person? XDDDDD Ok, LOL. XDDD But this is really strange. O_O
I have decisions to make, then, along the way. Should I listen and learn from people with more skills, more experience, more credentials? Of course. Should I be grateful for what I learn from them? Most definitely. I am grateful. It's always better to be more informed. But should I then obediently follow all their advice?
"Good luck to you", I said. "And you know what, right here, right now, you've made your start."
Research showed that there was too much iron in the water. People throw coins in the water to help the hothouses financially. Euro coins, which replaced earlier Dutch coins, of 5, 2 and 1 cents have copper and steel. In water, these coins rust.
Those that go searching for love, only manifest their own lovelessness. And the loveless never find love, only the loving find love. And they never have to seek for it.
Advice: An acupuncturist told me that this film can be removed by sloshing 2 tablespoons of cold-pressed olive oil in your mouth for 10-15 minutes (don’t swallow, whatever you do), then spitting it out into the toilet — not the sink, for you just removed toxins from your body and don’t want them in the sink. Brush your teeth and do the same. Then clean your brush. (Sorry this is yukky, but it works.)
It appears that the Sun is trying to whitewash the effects of it own campaigns. Why though? The Sun demanded an action and it was done. Surely the Sun would want people to know how much it influences government policy?
Corn flour and water mixture to thicken the gravy
To do this we are going to: first, define Spiritual Disciplines; second, look at a how they are often misused; and third, talk about how we should appropriately use them.
today that have caught my eye.
“Now that the Obama administration has appointed a majority of the members of the National Labor Relations Board, the NLRB leadership has imposed new requirements that employers supply union organizers with the names and home addresses of every employee. Nor do employees have a right to decline to have this personal information given out to union organizers, under NLRB rules.”
Alright, that’s what I’ve got this week. What’re you up to?
Just keep in mind what it that creating and do your best to add a theme to show consistency so there’s little feelings of clutter and mess and that’ll polish any artwork off with a tad more professionalism. Once you do that, the content of the artwork is entirely up to you. As stated earlier, I’m using a thought bubble and clouds to give my art piece a theme of “thought” and that’s how my work will keep consistent and professional. As much as I just go and do things on this paper, I don’t go too far off on a tangent or people will miss the point entirely.
it seems more real since finding out he's a boy. like there's more to lose.
If it can shine with someone’s love
To some extent, I understand that. He doesn’t want to be known to the public as an “atheist scientist” (like Richard Dawkins). He wants to be known as a scientist, period. There’s a huge advantage to that.
To me, being wealthy is not about HAVING lots of things, but about being in a position to DO lots of things.
In the Man-Made Global Warming scare, it is alleged that man-made industrial emissions of carbon dioxide are increasingly trapping heat, which would otherwise escape from our atmosphere, thus causing global warming. It is further believed that this increasing carbon dioxide level will reach a tipping point where the world will heat up to the point that life will no longer be sustainable on the planet.
System Memory (RAM) 4GB
I bought a festival tshirt that had the lineup (including my name) printed on the back. I spent the rest of the night trying to show people my name, on my back, in tiny writing, whilst attempting to stand still. #fail
Momo gave Aidan a really cute electronic toy cash register, and Aidan´s loving ringing up our grocery orders and giving us our bags of food.
I didn’t have the heart or the desire to place it back and continue eating.
To the closet!
No really though, this game is pretty brutal. I just now got back into this amazing game, from playing too much Blazblue, I was a bit rusty. Pfft. But anyways, I’m just here to give you some strategics. First, I would like to talk about scorpion. He’s very beginner friendly, but can be the hardest charcter to use because of all of the features they present with Scorpion.
Addison didn’t have time to make another move, her eyes quickly turning from the door Zak disappeared into and toward a demon running down the aisle towards her. His arms were held out slightly to his sides, his mouth open wide as a few foreign words slipped off his tongue.
Mr. Quiet, who was well-known but lightly regarded inside the ad industry, suddenly achieved great fame. As the president and chief creative officer of the agency that produced the brilliant Super Bowl spot, he went on to achieve godlike status.
In 1968 Enoch Powell said we must be 'mad, literally mad' for permitting the influx of foreign nationals into our country.
Him: Ok, Faith, go entertain the puppy.
King is of the view that the taxes paid by the extraordinarily rich are not in proportion to their good fortune, which he regards as an inequality of the system. King himself is a generous charitable giver to causes which genuinely help people.
We have an easy going routine that I lead and they follow of dinner, clean up time, brushing teeth and then a movie or books. They don't always fall asleep in the same place (couch or recliner or my bed or theirs) or in the same way (in front of a movie, after reading books I sing, or we all just lay down) or at the same time (I shoot for somewhere between 8 and 10 depending on whether or not D is home for me to spend time with him, how tired I am, how badly I want to be alone, whether or not L got a nap, how tired they are acting), but it works. Falling asleep is almost always a happy, relaxed time.
'Yes, but you MEANT IT,' said I, regaining a tiny momentum of Strop again.
Griggsby’s Station
PREMIUM FEATURES
The fourth book brings on a whole new story line as the wizard cup is being fought for by professionals and students. Reading this book the first time I was enthralled. For one there was so much detail and I was amazed. It was the longest book so far (next book even longer) and it kept me reading throughout.
I love you more than words can express, Momma.
Tom Parker has kept on making arrangements and playing for a lot of artists like Gerry Rafferty, Tim Rose, Chris White and a hundred more. Life is a lottery.
Their latest attack on kin selection is a big paper in the new Nature by Wilson, Martin Nowak and Corina Tarnita, all from Harvard. They begin by arguing that the classical argument for insect eusociality (cooperatively breeding societies in which “castes” of individuals, like the workers in bees, are sterile and help the queen produce offspring)—an argument based on asymmetrical relatedness—is wrong. This failure to explain eusociality, they claim, is a severe blow to kin-selection theory.
Andrew
one day. See, I'm not really sure if there's a a lot of
I’m not sure when I’ll get back to regular blogging and when I do, there may be a few changes. They do say a change is as good as a holiday, don’t they, and I’m all for holidays. Bring ‘em on!
"You won't miss me much?"
“Our performance at Barcelona during winter testing looked promising – but the form of the season is still very hard to read, so it’s difficult to predict who’ll be at the front next weekend.
After a while of testing, it became apparent that the only way to make sure a product was to use very high quality water, and grains in our ingredient. The second thing we then did was distill it 4 times to remove any natural impurities that may appear from the distilling process and then we filtered it a total of 7 times. Many people think the number of times you distill the vodka is the most important thing. While it is important, filtration is also very important and of course the quality of your water.
It turns out what I would have written has already been covered and probably better than I could have done,. so keep the good work, people are listening,
Works Consulted
Right until the long path ends.
In The Taste of Others (2000), a businessman falls in love with an actress, but they find it hard to adapt to each other’s milieux. Look at Me (2004) was about how power and success corrupt not only an individual, but his entourage.
New Toyz When My Momma Won A Card Game (My mom is Mel Gibson from Maverick?)
About that time her mother comes out of the Garage and says
Finally, make yourself available and watch for what happens. It may happen tomorrow, it might happen six months or years from now. You never know with God. But what I do know is that something will happen if each of us were moved by God’s Holy Spirit to pray for our neighbors, friends, family members and co-workers.
The fact is that I can see English script and often, can guess the original writer, began life by learning Chinese ideograms. A tell-tale sign: there is a certain consistent neatness in English handwriting. Or the fact, like a lot of Asians raised on home-Chinese cooking, we enjoy steamed fish in a bit of soy sauce, ginger root slices, green onions and oil. To us, that’s highlighting quality fresh whole fish. However a lot of non-Asians just see thjs steamed fish dish, as a boring, less dynamic dish.
ginger garlic paste 1 1/2 tsp
On this one year anniversary of the worst devastation Alabama has ever known, let me say I am beaming with pride to claim both Alabama and California as my home. I proudly display my Southern roots like a badge of honor as I journey through my Hollywood life. Today I salute you both!
Lupus further discriminates because it is two to three times more prevalent among women of color — African Americans, Hispanics/Latinos, Asians, Native Americans, Alaska Natives, Native Hawaiians and other Pacific Islanders — than among Caucasian women. However, despite its bias toward women, and especially women of color, when men develop lupus, their disease can be more severe and organ threatening than lupus in female lupus patients.
The Upsetters - Feelings Version
Because everyone should have a smoky eye in their arsenal, and you can do it with any color. Keeping color off of the bottom lashline keeps it from going over the top (and honestly, I hate lining the lower lashline). Not sure why the photo looks extra greenish, sorry!
"Heaven! I'm in heaven," sings Fred to Ginger. And when we watch them move, so are we.
The book consists of transcripts of informal talks with those who come to ask him questions. In one of these talks, he relates his life story, including the events leading up to and comprising what he calls his “calamity,” or his entry into the natural state. Since his own experience of coming into the natural state at age 49, he has spent his time traveling throughout the world, staying with friends or in rented apartments for a few months at a time. He gives no public talks, but meets with people who come to see him.
THE ADDICTION
It drinks modestly of autumn rains,
It's so easy to be blinded by that jealousy, to wonder why so-and-so got the Big Fancy Deal and you didn't. Unfortunately, there's no real answer, just like there was no reason my cousins "deserved" a Power Wheels more than my brother and me. They just got one. And we didn't. That's it. Looking back, I know that said nothing about my value as a child, even though back then it felt like it did.
Battle.
If you are not a fan of vegetarian food, you just haven’t had any good vegetarian food yet. For all of you out there sneering at the idea of eating tofu or jeering at the thought of an entree that doesn’t bleed, lower those noses! Good vegetarian food is hearty and savory. In fact, I challenge you to think of how many things you eat regularly that are already vegetarian. I bet you would be surprised. I like to tout eating vegetarian at least one day a week, mainly because Americans eat WAY more meat than we need or should. Not only does this have implications for our own culture and way of life, but also for the rest of the world. If you don’t believe me, just read some Michael Pollan. But if you don’t care about that, eating vegetarian once or twice a week can also help your health.
….Donghae-ah.. please take me with you..”
At the risk of being branded immoral and unchristian, it’s now time to open the closet doors with a few more frank Christian sexual and single discussions. There is no denying that I find sexuality very interesting. Maybe it has something to do with the fact that anything surrounding sex is kept an open secret for may centuries. Take for instance, old hollywood would depict married people sleeping in separate twin beds. Male doctors would masturbate women (invention of vibrators) to cure female psychological illnesses while at the same time denounced female sexuality and orgasm. Back in the day, people had scores of children to increase the survival rate of their families but young girls and guys would be married without knowing where to put what. The current day religions and conservative countries that chastise anything sexual tend to sanction men having multiple wives (or lovers) with numerous children. In a recent news report from the middle east, there is an ongoing fight to make sure women do not drive cars because the upstanding men thought if they did, then it would allow women to have more illicit sexual opportunity (interestingly the report did not mention that the ‘council’ was worried about the other half of the sexual equation-the men)…bla bla bla. As I said, an open secret.
1.Sweden 307
The Usual Suspects
Sex with animals was banned until 1969, when the animal protection law was introduced, but failed to include a specific ban on zoophilia, the Frankfurter Rundschau said.
The bad news is he really has fucked up big time. You know that's the case when even the Americans are looking across the pond tutting and shaking their heads.
A longer description of the factual background appears on the IPKat this morning, here. This post focuses on what the Court of Appeal said about the Court of Justice of the European Union ruling in Case C-5/08 Infopaq, which has caused a good deal of consternation in copyright circles of late. The question before the Court of Appeal at this juncture was whether a headline could be protected by copyright as an original literary work. Said the Court:
An interest in antique weaponry and a forgotten tradition of western hand-t0-hand combat led science fiction author Greg Bear to the theme and story line of the Mongoliad project. On the way, he and his partners developed PULP, the “Personal Ubiquitous Literary Platform.” PULP is is billed as connected publishing, and in their keynote session, Bear and Stephenson contended that content as service is the only viable business model when piracy is ubiquitous: “create an experience that can’t be pirated.”
Everton 4/7(PP), Draw 3/1(Bwin), Blackburn 6/1(PP)
2. rub minced garlic on salmon
2) NOTE TO OKLAHOMANS:
Eden Creamer
A couple of minutes in, I noticed some hard stuff under my fingertips. It was sort of hard white pieces. I'm not certain, but I am guessing these are "impurities"? When my arms finally started to get tired (around the 20 minute mark) I decided I might as well move on to the next step although I was REALLY enjoying my facial massage!
"Forestfloor 2" see Rehburg's industrial machinery take on a more rhythmic nature (almost sounding like mechanical frogs or boars). Sonically similar to the first track (and the two after this one), it distinguishes itself by having a feeling of malice and menace to it (as opposed to the foreboding nature of the first track). The mid-range guitars are also pushed much further back in the mix, as opposed to being very noticeable in the first track. Less variation on the electronics, though. Thankfully, creepy organic noises are introduced ten minutes in (along with more guitar feedback), saving the song from musical stagnation (although it could be argued that by then it's too little, too late). A break at 11:00 minutes is a nice transition from the previous homogenous cacaphony. Eventually, all that remains is broken riffing and a half-hearted buzzing, as if the song itself is dying from the inside.
09/06/2011 SELL 0.01 usdchf 0.82308
Men's 800 - Abubaker Kaki (SUD) v Yuri Borzakovski (RUS). Borzakovski is a fine kicker but Kaki has been the dominant 800 man the past couple of seasons. Could be an early picture of the final in Berlin.
When my son was younger, he would observe racist outrages, but they would pass, and he was young enough to forget them, such as the racist black female city bus driver who locked the front door of the bus on me, when he was eight.
As for what is On My Plate, it is summer; it is hot. Nobody wants to lock themselves in the kitchen with a blazing oven to make a dessert. Why not perk up purchased ice cream treats with chocolate coating and sprinkles? I don't know if I will ever get to Hundreds and Thousands of posts, but lets treat ourselves to something cool and celebrate our menus with a little life thrown in.
Kate at Centsational Girl can do no wrong, right? Every project and craft she whips up is genius....and I'm especially smitten with her DIY Faux-Bois Vases! Why does she have to live across the country? It makes stalking her so much harder.
- Ends unravel a lot
This is Apple. Thumb to cheek, rotated back and forth. Like the “apple of the cheek” this the Apple one eats and often after the sign of apple one sees a pantomime of picking up an apple and biting into it. I am saying the word “apple” as the photo was snapped.
She laughs brightly. “How about someone who wasn’t a pathological liar and womanizer?”
Remember the definition of leadership we started with, “organizing a group of people to achieve a common goal.” Think about organizing your company around the powerful culture that you believe in and then finding others who hold the same values. Then paint a picture of the amazing vision that you want to achieve with the help of your team. Imagine how powerful and profitable your company will be when a team of like-minded folks are all working to achieve the same goals because they are excited about where they are headed with you.
To make your own puree, slice 1 mango into cubes. The flesh from the seed can be used too. However it has loads of fibre, therefore, try not to slice onto the seed. With a food processor or blender, puree the mango. Sieve it through a sieve and follow further instructions below to make your mango mousse.
Do it for wrights pies
I have no more pleadings left. The Judge will determine whether death is eminent.
In arguing for the benefits of the free market as a means of controlling dissident opinion in the mid-nineteenth century, the Liberal chancellor of the British exchequer, Sir George Lewis, noted that the market would promote those papers “enjoying the preference of the advertising public.” Advertising did, in fact, serve as a powerful mechanism weakening the working-class press. Curran and Seaton give the growth of advertising a status comparable with the increase in capital costs as a factor allowing the market to accomplish what state taxes and harassment failed to do, noting that these “advertisers thus acquired a de facto licensing authority since, without their support, newspapers ceased to be economically viable.”
It doesn't have to be exact because if any of the blue shows, it's going to be gone the first time you wash it, and from a very short distance, you can't even see it.
Within the month, you will be done with college. You will be kicked out of your cozy dorm room and, for the first time in your 22 years on this planet, you will be forced to completely fend for yourself. You will find yourself without the amenities that you have had in college, instead replaced with thousands of dollars of student loan debt, a degree in art history that only qualifies you for a job as a bagboy at the local Piggly Wiggly, and an understanding of the proper way to cook Ramen noodles.
Mix all ingredients in a large mixing bowl. Mix the dressing in another bowl and
What can I cook now that will be easy to freeze and make for easy meals once the baby arrives next month?
I know that the health care system here in France faces issues of how it will continue to pay for all the care, but I really hope this will last. Because it feels amazing when a society takes care of its citizens. When it's seen as a right, not a privilege to receive basic health care.
Ownership : Google, Manufacturers
Singing
The heart of a woman falls back with the night,
You got a real gift, son
i worry that they will spend more energy on being beautiful and getting noticed, hence become more materialistic and self-obsessed than they should be, forgetting the fact that whatever were given naturally, are blessings from Allah SWT.
First, the quality of the content is excellent. The authors have a wonderful ability to distill key ideas concisely without sacrificing depth. Second, the size is right. The chapters are a manageable size and the book isn’t overwhelming. The diversity of content keeps it fresh, while staying relevant to key apologetic topics. Third, it introduces the reader to the key voices on the apologetic landscape. It also provides helpful pointers to key resources for further reading. This is a great place to get started down the right path in dealing with each particular issue. Finally, this book covers the kind of issues that we deal with everyday in conversation, on the internet, and as we grapple with the issues ourselves.
I would guess I drink more Tim Hortons coffee than the average Canadian– and certainly much more than most people I know. I’ve consumed 74 Timmies game cups since the contest started February 20 (with another in hand currently). That’s not counting the occasional Starbucks, the magnificently-bottomless cups at diners, or non-game cups from Tim Hortons (one of my local Timmies ran out of XL cups recently and I’ll be damned if I’m going to drink less coffee just to get a chance at a freebie).
It has now came to light that the SA police have "lost" 20 429 weapons since April 2004.
Currydesu’s compilation shall be up soon. I promiseee~
E@L's eyes are now glazing. It's fascinating, but how is he going to remember all this? The wind is burning cold. Bitter, cold, like an ex-girlfriend. They move into the single shed, quite a few barrels, lots he supposes, but at least, hey out of the wind. There is a dead bird at the doorstep. Gift from a cat?
Personal rights can be compared with real rights. Real rights were created by roman law centuries ago. Real rights are rights in assets. Your ownership of an asset is a real right. But there are others. For example, in Scotland, a tenant holding under a lease has a real right. Or a creditor in a standard security (the technical Scottish term for what punters refer to as mortgages) has a real right. To explain that one, in the example above assume that I loaned Ted money but was worried that Ted wouldn’t pay me back. I could have said to Ted (as banks typically say to people borrowing substantial sums of money from them) – I will not lend you the money unless you give me a right in your house. This right in the house is a standard security. Now, how is that better than a personal right? Well a real right is a right in a specific asset. Thus, if Ted buggers off and sells his house I would still have the security in the house, whoever the new owner was. Additionally, the real rights have priority in the event of the insolvency of the debtor. So if Ted goes bust that has no impact on the real right. It remains as powerful as it was before. If that real right is a security (such as a standard security) the creditor typically has power to sell the asset without having to involve any other creditor, and if the asset is sold during insolvency the real right ensures that the creditor gets first cut when the proceeds of sale are divided out. In summry then being a right in an asset a real right is stronger than a personal right.
LK exchange received from Lisa V
But I know a change gonna come, oh yes it will”
Thinking of you always,
What do you say when you know that many are stranded in the rubble of buildings just a few blocks away? What do you say when airports are closed, power is down, water is compromised and people are in panic trying to get away to their loved ones? What do you say when you can not be their to offer a solution out and know that she will have to rely on herself and others to make the next move? How do you say it in a text message?
Being a Muchacho of honor, I have decided to finally and officially break it down. I assure you that Titanic’s popularity is only a small reason I hate it.
The councillors’ fiduciary responsibility to this community has been abandoned by thorough incompetence and deception that borders on the criminally fraudulent. This will require direct action by the Minister of Local Government, Nick Smith. There is no getting around this.
18"18" Rives BFK, molding paste, stencil, collograph, water based inks, acrylic, oil pastel and collage.
My original plan was to blog a race report from my first trail race in February. Then it rained/snowed and got postponed since they didn’t want to tear up the trails. I suppose I could have blogged about other things, but my life just isn’t that interesting. I run, I work, I mom, I wife, and I love every second of it. See, now you’re caught up on my life. Oh, and here’s a picture of my kids because they are freaking adorable.
I have been remiss.
They are very revealing.
Moorabbin VIC 3189
And I’m bitter. I wouldn’t be so bitter if his video wasn’t like professionally done. I mean like with an actual sound recorder and video editors and people who know what they’re doing. Also his speech sounded like it was written by the dean of chamberlain or something. It was pretty ridiculous. It felt like a video that a college recruiter would show parents and potential students on why they should come to chamberlain. I’m not bitter because I lost. I’m bitter because it was unfair. If they had chosen an actual student video taped on a cellphone or a digital camera I would have been ok. But this kid had to spend a couple hundred of dollars to have someone make his movie. It even sounded like he had someone write the script. It was just unfair.
This beer has had a bit of a story to tell before it ever made it to Christmas.
and misrule.
Here are a few of the photos that I've been lovin' today.
Looking back at this blog, I realize I have been very guarded in talking about my negative emotions throughout this whole experience. I think mothers have a tendency to feel guilty for even having the slightest negative feeling...let alone putting it out there for the whole world to read about.
Did you ever imagine such reasoning would be considered sound public policy and allowed to stand as the basis for circumventing private property rights?
Another first time trade partner for the Quarry is Edgar from the simple yet aptly named Topps Card Collector's Blog. I sent him a chunk of 1988 Topps and in return I got a small handful of Rockies and the Ricky Romero above which helps with my 2011 Topps Opening Day master set. My favorite Rockie is the Todd Helton which is from the 2007 Topps Wal Mart set and used the 1967 Topps design. I wonder if he will still be with the team when Heritage uses 1967 in four years. Probably not, but we can always hope.
which all you mommies out there know isn't easy when you're 32 weeks pregnant.
History of the Church: A seven-volume work containing the faith-promoting history as seen by nineteenth-century church historians. Not to be taken literally, except in those places where it makes Joseph Smith look good.
OCALA, Fla. — An Ocala woman called 911 and told police that she shot her husband while in their home at the 1200 block of S.E. 19th Street Wednesday night, Marion County investigators said Thursday.
Me: Not, it is spring
I love all the characters really........ yep, even the evil President Snow..... he was spot on. And Peeta? Sigh..... unconditional love, I tell ya..... it's what we all want, right?
The 15-year fixed mortgage averaged 3.07 percent (0.7 point), also below its all-time record low when it was 3.11 percent April 12 of this year. Last week, the 15-year averaged 3.12 percent, and a year ago, it was 3.89 percent.
Do you know the feeling, where every situation looks like a dead-end road, every thought ends in disbelief and despair?
DTGVL’s calendar really revs up in May with a smorgasbord of fun! The merriment begins May 2 with Moonlight Movies. Featuring everything from family favorites like “The Muppet Movie” to nostalgic cinema classics such as “An American in Paris”, everyone from Grandma to the kids will find a film they like. Screenings take place every Wednesday in May around 8PM and due to the construction at The Peace Center, will happen in a new Falls Park location this year. Lawn chairs, blankets and picnics are welcomed (and fun), but like most City-sponsored events, pets are prohibited.
Is how so many people
Get out of your comfort zone and save a life.
Religion is about devotion. Reverence. Worship. Religion can morph into a series of moral checks and the like, but to keep it simple, religion is about these basic concepts. It’s about belief and faith. As a polytheist, my religion is also about the gods.
I do try to go for unusual names, but not very exotic or tongue-twisting ones which can give the readers a verbal paralysis. Indian names by and large are not easy on the tongue. One of my CP’s who is an Indian, went nuts trying to pronounce the difficult names of my characters. Her critique was, “ I loved the first ten pages, but, honey, please go easy on the names. I had an extremely difficult time pronouncing the names.”
Supposed to be good - but is it really?
the world does not revolve around you. we are not the on-board entertainment crew. manners are as important with your family as they are with strangers. private conversations are just that PRIVATE, please don't ask what people are talking about if you happen to overhear anything. if it wasn't immediately repeated at your appearance, then it really doesn't concern you.
06 - Keyboard Solo
18. bb&c - The Veil
–Next on the docket, Texas. Even though I grew up in Houston, I had somehow never traveled to Fort Worth. That is, until I got the chance to write about it. I kind of love this town. For one thing, it’s weird, and weird is lovable. There’s a district call The Stockyards where two times a day, a cattle drive rumbles through the streets. The cattle are actually owned by the Fort Worth Convention Bureau (what other convention bureau can lay claim to a herd?) and the drovers (i.e. those who drive the cattle) are employees of the convention bureau. The point of the whole thing is to pay tribute to Fort Worth’s history as the last watering hole on the Chisholm Trail, before opening up to the wild, wild west. So twice a day, seven days a week, drovers dressed in old-fangled clothes drive the cattle down the cobblestone streets in the middle of this historic district. Also in Fort Worth: Billy Bob’s, the world’s largest honky tonk (and also the first honky tonk I’ve ever done seen). While all of these things are pretty fitting for a Texas town, what surprised me about Fort Worth is its impressive museum district. There are multiple art museums, the Museum of Science and History and even the Cowgirl Hall of Fame, all within walking distance. Just a couple miles away is the lively downtown, where tasty Texas restaurants and darling boutiques make for an entertaining stroll. The travel piece I wrote about Fort Worth will run Luxury Las Vegas magazine, and I’m working on getting it some press elsewhere, as well.
...which might bring us to the inner therapist...caring yet dangerously opinionated, ever groping toward that celebrated inner child...
I did; at that point, I really did want some of that tit. On my second try I caught the nipple between my lips and sucked, and her smile hardened into a happy grimace and she released my wrists. I reached up to free the other breast and tug the bra over her shoulders with her cooperation so I could toss it aside and take both breasts in my hands, rub my thumbs over the nipples, and suckle at each of them alternately while L worked her jeans and panties off as quickly as she could and lowered herself over my hard dick, plunging me into exquisite pleasure before she took my wrists again and held them flat next to my head while she raised her hips and humped down on me again, grinning with a hard, satisfied “huh.”
The challenge was to use an inchie (a one inch square with any type design you like). I colored the schoolhouse from Tiddly Inks on kraft cardstock. I then cut it into 4 equal sections to make 4 inchies. The bottom is the cream cardstock I used above with a sentiment rubber stamp. I used some twine from Jilliebean Soup. I'm thinking about using this card for the Wonderkid's new teachers. He'll meet them tomorrow and I thought it would be nice to start the year off with a card.
There really isn’t one. I suppose we shall see who made the most of their time, money and resources after the Spanish GP. Luckily, with the title this closely contested, there is still plenty of time for anyone to find that sweet-spot and really put some distance between themselves and their rivals. Many of us hope it goes right down to the wire between many pilots for the championship – all or nothing with a roll of the F1 dice.
“Whoa geez, huh, whoops, oh well, oops, sorry, ha ha wait again?, ok just…, my bad?”
Manchester City celebrate their title win
“Who do you see as the person who will carry your responsibilities?“
"Rel, what are you doing?" Dora's voice held fear, not scorn.
It is with deep regret that we must inform you of the passing of Michael Jackson, the Beer Hunter, who died yesterday at his home in London, UK. We learned of his passing from our colleagues - Jay Brooks at Brookston Beer Bulletin and Julie and Daniel Bradford at All About Beer.
I wanted to get on here and vent about it because it’s interesting how healthcare workers are treated.
Awed, I lowered my head, pulled the flier out of my pocket, and handed it to her. She nodded, and led from the foyer into a room full of lit candles, burning incense, and lave lamps. Hanging on one wall was a black velvet painting of a wizard seated on a unicorn, his magic wand doubling as a riding crop. In the middle of the room was a small table with a crystal ball. I sat on one side, Madame Imelda on the other. She held out her hand, and I gave her the ten dollars. She turned away and beckoned,
We'd like you to create a papercraft project (it does not have to be a card) that expresses an attitude of gratitude - show us some heartfelt sentiments too! Your creation can be for any occasion whatsoever, as long as it's a thank you!
But with pundits already making faith a major issue in this presidential campaign — as evidenced by questions about Republican Mitt Romney’s Mormonism — Obama’s religious background is likely to come under further scrutiny.
There were 12 items on the list. If an employee did any one of these they could enter their name in the drawing. In fact, they could enter as many times as they actually completed that item. They also could enter a co-workers name for them, if they felt they deserved it.
Me: "But, but..."
“Now!”
10 Seven Seas
Voodoo Walking by Mama Rosin with Hipbone Slim & The Knee Tremblers
Also should Nate be asked
You probably remember best remember virtual reality due to its ubiquity in the 1990s. Films like the Denzel Washington cop film Virtuosity, thriller The Lawnmower Man, and at the end of the decade, The Matrix, popularized the idea of virtual reality in American technology culture. Video game companies like Nintendo, Sega, and Atari, all attempted to put “Virtual Reality” systems on the market. (Nintendo’s failed Virtual Boy system is the most memorable of these awful early prototypes). While the concept of virtual reality captured the imaginations of everyday Americans, the technology was still years, perhaps decades, off.
The thought of you, now you’re far away
I take one more look at the world behind me and then begin to run back through the trees which widen before me and my destiny.
The lack of computers at schools is another lame excuse, as 100’s of private corporations, inside the country as well as overseas, have donated millions rands worth of high-tech equipment, as well as FREE TRAINING to people in disadvantaged regions, in their efforts to boost social investment programmes.
Otherwise known as The Chapter Yet Unwritten...
My high top oxfords were a love at first sight experience. I really feel like a newsboy when I wear them. I went to Madewell and b-lined it to the sale area like I normally do. I saw them sitting there lonely and sad and I felt I could do something to help them! When I saw that they were a size 9, I reassured the sales lady that thick socks would make them a perfect fit. Fortunately, she had a pair of socks on hand and I tried them on...close enough...Purchased! So now they're kinda too big but I love them all the same.
And so take the time to choose me
(Considering the fact that the issue comes up annually, I’m not certain I’ve been successful at stemming said tide, but it’s a work in process.)
"Dick might have been the guy to shame Cage out of his laziness by waving in his face the DVD boxes for Gone In Sixty Seconds, National Treasure or Captain Corelli's Mandolin, and warning him that he faced turning 60 one day, making endless ridiculous movies in front of blue screens while clutching to his sagging breast yet another hottie several decades his junior like, well, Jessica Biel?"
Officially, I have joined two dating sites. In doing so, I've spent a lot of time cruising through my 'matches'.....wow......um....well.....hmmm. Worse than that, I've had to write a profile for myself.....and on eHarmony they make you take a test.....seriously, a personality test so they can match you with someone who will want to date you. Seriously. I'm starting to think no one will want to date me.....in fact, I've not had any action.....just a few look sees. I'm not ugly, I am 'curvy' (because I refuse to call myself "a few extra pounds") and I'm funny, witty, smart and loyal....kind of like my dog....I'm even sort of short, like my dog....he's a daucshund. That aside, it is gruesome out there.
(what would you do
Saturday we had a late breakfast with Trinity's family before heading over to the Dallas Arboretum for Dallas Blooms. I have to say I was a little disappointed that the tulips had already died, but we did find a few pretty blooms to snap some pictures of Grace. Luke and Gracie loved exploring the grounds, and Grace enjoyed the petting zoo. Luke wasn't so sure about touching any of the animals, which I can't blame him... they looked pretty dirty!
So to Him I shall cling, and pray the world makes sense someday.
Thanks for checking me out again today! Hoping to be back again soon with a new page layout!!
To find out more:
My blog traffic is back up to the levels I had in 2005. Who says blogging is dead? It is just now part of a family of things like twitter, plurk, brightkite and the ever present spaces & books. My little beer blog even appears on AllTop's site, under BEER. Which is why we got the glassware giveaway. Yay. This week I was contacted by a PR person, on behalf of the Buckbean Brewing Company, located in Reno, NV. Right now their beers are really only available in Nevada, and not even widely available at that. But they are beating their drums well, and getting good reviews, so who knows what will happen in the future. The best part is that they are going to SEND ME SOME BEER! Whee! I've been at this for 4 years now. This is my first freebie. I'm so excited.
Oh, and I totally left my running/training pants at home by accident. So if I were to run, I’d have to wear my sleepy pants. Which wouldn’t be terrible.
Crescent moon energy if for organizing resources needed to accomplish the vision, intentions, wishes, aspiriations or goals.
On 1st December Tommy Broughan TD was expelled from the Labour Party after voting to reject a government amendment to extend the bank guarantee for another year.1st December also marks the day that Roscrea District Court solicitors stage a walkout over the courthouse’s closure.2011 was a year long celebration of craft in Ireland.Ireland has been ranked the most charitable country in Europe and the second most charitable nation in the world, according to a new survey.The K Club Kildare has just been awarded with the title of ‘AA Ireland Hotel of the Year’ for 2010/2011.UCC was selected as University of the Year 2011-2012.Barry, managing director of the Barry Group, which is behind franchises such as BuyLo and Costcutter, has been named MSL Cork Business Person of the Year 2011.What a year once wonders what will 2012 bring, whatever it is I hope it is a good year for you all.
A serving machine adds a layer of frozen (-5C) foam at the end of the pour. Just the thing, I suppose, for the hot summer months. The claim is made that this will allow the beer to stay cold for half an hour. From the photos, the foam looks very much like a "soft cream,"which could also add to its attraction.
About Free Printed Invitations by PartyPOP.com:
temperatures hit triple digits.
* tell me that I am too sensitive
The only other thing I’ll add is, like—I left—that I don’t have healthcare right now. I don’t have anything. It’s not like I saved a bunch of money, and I’m doing this. It’s that I made a decision in 2009 that I just was not happy, and I made a decision to the detriment of my family, whom I support in Palestine, right? But the thing is, is like, right now, it’s vindicated by where people are. And all of a sudden, you’re on the streets. You have your time. You can do good with your time. You can grow and, in the process, at least feel better about what you’re doing in the world.
Kelly is our office loudmouth. She chatters endlessly about every detail of her personal life. I don’t want to constantly be hearing about how her son has done at soccer practice, how she has a new cat, how her husband is going back to school again instead of getting a job, how she has this lump on her side that she needs to get checked out. If I want to know these things, I’ll sign up for her online newsletter.
"Oh," sheepishly replied Johnny. "That's a loaf of bread."
The thing is...at any age practice is the only thing that makes perfect so today I am learning to practice. Perfection comes, one day at a time.
“Pakistan is a peace-loving and moderate country and wants to have friendly and cordial relations with all countries, including India,” the premier said while addressing a “special integration camp” being attended by contingents of scouts and girl guides from India and Pakistan.
I used a doily for the both current weekly challenge and last weeks. The previous weeks challenge was to use masking - the doily served as my mask. This weeks challenge was to include a homemade flower and I used the doily from the previous challenge as part of the background. The masking/inking of the doily was done with TH Distress Stain.
Eventually in time I believe Instagram could be a part of journalism. I highly doubt it will make it into print journalism, but it could have a place in online journalism. After all, Instagram is just a mobile app that’s only accessible from your phone. You can’t access photos from the web to Instagram unless they are posted through Twitter or Facebook.
Cassel Sharpe knows he’s been used as an assassin, but he’s trying to put all that behind him. He’s trying to be good, even though he grew up in a family of con artists and cheating comes as easily as breathing to him. He’s trying to do the right thing, even though the girl he loves is inextricably connected with crime. And he’s trying to convince himself that working for the Feds is smart, even though he’s been raised to believe the government is the enemy.
Are you a vegan?
Without a desire to curate organic, not-for-profit art events – Alvarado is currently not paying herself, or any of her helpers – she may not have noticed the disused dental surgery-cum-art gallery which she has rented the ground floor of for her debut Alvarado Gallery exhibition.
Collect 35 Solar on an drop-pod drop.
Like eagle rounding out the morning
The mountain of spiritual experience whose summit is divine union, identified by John of the Cross at the beginning of The Ascent of Mount Carmel: “the summit of the mount—that high state of perfection we here call union of a soul with God . . . The darkness and trials, spiritual and temporal, that fortunate souls ordinarily undergo on their way to the high state of perfection are so numerous and profound that human science cannot understand them adequately. Nor does experience of them equip one to explain them. Only those who suffer them will know what this experience is
Who likes to walk on the wild side?
And I am consumed.
There is no cocktail menu, but the resident mixologist will rustle something up sur mesure depending on your preference and his inspiration (although mostly on the latter - he does tend, rather endearingly, to impose his cocktail ideas), which you can then sip in any of the apartment-like rooms or even in the human-scale birdcage for a more amorous moment.
It was interesting, and actually quite good! I will say, I am LOVING the Chocolate PB2 and can’t wait to formulate some recipes with it!
My Love is your Love
She shut all the blinds. She tightens all the windows. And crawls into the dark corners of herself.
The Constitutional Court is sitting in judgment on Zuma. They create a hullabaloo in public. That is preparing society for their pouncing. That is the issue. “They must give the judgment and not prepare us. They must not use Hlophe as a scapegoat to hit at Zuma.”
Violet was a vampire and she still craved blood. To meet her needs, he had taken up pig farming and bred a whole herd of pigs on board the TARDIS for her to feed on. He also carried a chemical substitute in case they ever got separated from the ship. He had no intention of ever becoming Violet's victim. When he was especially pleased with her, he would offer her his arm or neck to give her a little taste. Time Lord blood was a great delicacy for her. It was not something he allowed her too often. That was the wonderful thing about her blood thirst. It meant that she could be manipulated so easily. He had often chosen companions who were addicted to drugs. As long as he was the one with the supply on the TARDIS, he could get his human assistants to do what he wanted.
Location/Affiliates: Mount Sinai Medical Center (Manhattan)
If you like great acting, (awesome) british humour, classic detective stories with a twist and a seeing bit of london, it’s defenitly something for you.
“He pulls two rusty screws out of his pocket and looks at me like a shady car mechanic and says, I don’t know how to tell you this, but you have a problem with your chimney cap.” “Wow,” I wanted to tell him to keep his paws off my chimney cap, and I don’t know where those rusty screws have been but I’m sure they didn’t come from my chimney cap, as I’m sure my chimney cap has not seen the light of day in quite some time so he’d better keep those rusty screws away from her!”
A very late hello to you all,
~ kirsty
Hope you can make it for the inaugural flight of Radio Podrophenia!!
1-800-477-8191
I read something the other day that really irked me. Got me fired up in a mama bear sort of way. A Catholic blogger who used to homeschool wrote, "Anyone who says they enjoy homeschooling is either a beginner or in denial."
In Kuwait, where for years Islamists fought women’s enfranchisement, they hounded the four women who finally made it into parliament, demanding that the two who didn’t cover their hair wear hijabs. When the Kuwaiti parliament was dissolved this past December, an Islamist parliamentarian demanded the new house — devoid of a single female legislator — discuss his proposed “decent attire” law.
So when I said that communists have murdered 100,000,000 people in the last century by starving, executing, or freezing them to death in gulags, that doesn’t actually count, but when an African kid dies of malaria because angsty urban American liberals got DDT banned to protect bird’s eggs, that’s the fault of capitalism… Gotcha.
This can be felt even when we are still living.
Joan, name ONE dirty deed that either of your sisters ever DID to you…name it, the deed, NOT AN IMPRESSION FROM YOUR MIND. NAME the deed and provide the evidence of that deed.
The report itself lacks detail. It does not explain why funding could not be found and says nothing about what governmental, grant or European funding might, or might not, be available. It does however suggest that upto £10 million of capital funding could be allocated towards the project by the Council.
All I could think about was how it was wrong and how I couldn’t fix it and this made me a terrible employee and on and on. And in the grand scheme of things, it’s really not that big a deal. But I couldn’t stop myself from thinking I should do something more to fix it. Go back to the (empty) office. Send emails (to people I knew couldn’t fix it). Call my boss (who was already home, and couldn’t fix it from there, and whom I already emailed). I was able to see that all of these thoughts were completely irrational, though, and when it started to turn into what a terrible employee and, therefore, terrible person I was, I forcibly distracted myself and the thoughts subsided.
I'm torn. Vampires + Dissection = ???
The album's primary sonic colours are crystalline and prismatic – and that's down to harp player Zeena Parkins, an instrument called the celeste, and a music box Björk had specially made from glass rather than wood ("so it sounds more plunky"), with her own tunes scored on big brass discs.
Went to church for the first time (more on that to come later!)
When ready to cook the chicken, preheat the oven to 350 degrees. Place the chicken breasts in a baking dish and pour the excess marinade over them. Bake in the oven until cooked through and the internal temperature reaches 165 degrees, about 45 minutes (exact baking time will depend on the size of your chicken pieces.) Remove from the oven and let rest for 5 minutes before serving.
First, make yourself a cocktail, then chose four bloggers who have contributed greatly to the world of blogging.
The circle was cut at 2.5".
WOW! I always read right before bed, and I picked up this novel with the intention of whetting my appetite through a few chapters, but I ended up reading the entire novel in one sitting. Needless to say, I got very little sleep, but the story was well worth it, permeating my dreams once the tale came to an end—it is that powerful!
we went on a hunt for the perfect junior beat marina costumes.
"We succeeded in getting a description of the assailants from the tour guide before she was taken to the hospital," Franco said.
LABORS OF LOVE was a fanzine-styled history of comic fandome written by former SENSE OF WONDER editor Bill Schelly, who later extrapolated on the idea with a large softcover book that filled in a lotta the missing details and general historical background that clued more'n a few newcomers about such crucial comic fanzines as ALTER EGO, XERO and STAR STUDDED COMICS. A nice and breezy li'l read that'll take you at least two pre-beddy bye sittings to complete, LABORS gives the basic backgrounds and general impressions regarding the birth and grown of comic book fandom courtesy Schelly, a guy who has a takent to really show ya just how much of an importance comic fandom was in the sixties, enough that he can actually zone you back to that early/mid-sixties teenage gulcher fun and games attitude that permeated itself into everything from comic books to tee-vee, rock 'n' roll, slot car racing and even the kind of new pleasure foods were being pumped at us from cathodes nationwide. Makes me feel sorry for kids today who have nothing but computer gadgetry and their genitals to rely on!
Nope,….not yet. Do you remember what Jesus told the disciples to do??????? Lol….
When a manuscript sits in a drawer, the fruit withers.
“So how come people can pick and choose what they want to use in the Bible? The Bible says marriage is between a man and a woman, but it also says that adulterers should be stoned. (Well, that would have taken care of Newt Gingrich and John Edwards.) People don’t support stoning people.” (And the Bible says slavery is OK, if your child strays from the faith he should be stoned, and anyone who works on the Sabbath should be put to death.)
All my clues are in this playing ;)
Unschooling preserves-your originality, your curiosity your self-trust.
by campfire,
That will be down to good’ole B.Liar, Plunkitt and co. Nobody wanted to hear it back in the early 2000′s…and apparently ‘nobody’ voted for these idiots -time and time again. Still fewer ‘nobody’s’ wanted our boy’s to be killed in a ‘toilet’ as one man said earlier…and ‘nobody’ wanted the banks to be allowed to destroy our economy… Its pretty not ironic that NOBODY wants to see, hear or listen to Milli-Bland nor Mr. Balls at the moment… One thing is for sure. The treaties that Labour signed us up to for before they were hauled out of office….NOBODY WILL BE ABLE TO REMOVE THESE CRIMINALS IN THE FORESEEABLE FUTURE…
There is one simple way of testing whether the smoking ban has been popular and successful—get rid of it. If people really don't want to go back to the days of smoky pubs, there is really no reason to have a law forcing pubs to be smokefree. Get rid of the law, let the market decide, and if pubs remain entirely nonsmoking we'll know that ASH were right all along. If, however, pubs decide to accommodate smokers once more, we'll know, if we hadn't realised already, that ASH cannot be trusted.
Last Thursday, 18 April 2008, Pope Benedict XVI spoke at the Ecumenical Prayer Service held in Saint Joseph’s Church in New York City. Tomorrow the monastic calendar will commemorate a woman whose life illustrates much of what the Holy Father said. Celebrating the saints is integral to what Pope Benedict XVI calls “diachronic koinonia — communion with the Church in every age” that saves us from the narrow uncatholic perspective of the immediate here and now of a given local community.
Accende lumen sensibus: infunde amorem cordibus: infirma nostri corporis virtute firmans perpeti.
If you could let me know in the comments section, I'd be much obliged.
“I had to be sure of my feelings.”
This day I walked up a hill road until I found a break in the hedgerow and a place with a big view. I could look way down into the valley and almost hear the fever of the jigs and reels, while the silent sea of heaven rolled overhead.
I’ve been missing. I’m sorry. Thank you so much for all the sweet emails and comments checking on me and worrying about me.
OU comments: This was the 1st US tour for then 21 year old Sinéad who was riding the hugely popular debut album "the lion and the cobra". At the time of this posting (late March 2012) there was just one other earlier USA Sinéad show, five days before this one from March 26th at the World in N.Y.C.
1 unsuitable
A lot of her inner dialog after the accident reminds me of my husband, a paraplegic from a motorcycle accident. This connection and similarity made me feel especially close to Kristin.
and prayed for your protection.
- 12 ounces good chocolate (60% cacao), broken up
For the right Faith is, that we believe and confess, that our Lord Jesus Christ, the Son of
Pinball Machine Sequence Launched
Calligraphy Collection for the writing on the scroll (used with Cricut markers)
In combining the layers of the risk factors; such as low down payment, lower representative score, with prior credit issues with no reserves after closing, and a high loan to value indicate a high risk is involved for mortgage default.
It is evident that there is a continuous need for many different devices which include laptops, MP3 players, mobiles and other cordless tools. This has consequently resulted in a greater need for rechargeable batteries.
I am meeting Gary in Scottsdale tonight so that we can give my sister, my brother, and my niece's mom their birthday cards and gifts. You have seen two of those cards; the card for my sister, Barbara, will be up at the end of the month.
No such "hands off" gentleman's game is possible between Pakistan, India, and China. They are immediate neighbors. Their game takes on a whole new color.
Then there was the issue of sides. I made no vegetables because I felt the meatloaf was veggie-enriched enough. I still wanted to serve more on the plate than just a slab of meatloaf. I raided the cabinets for something usable. I guess I cleaned out the cabinet pretty well in the past. I had no rice or other grains. All I had was a box of cornmeal. Since I had some rice flour in the freezer, I made some gluten-free cornbread on the side.
The image is from here and is coloured with copics, backing paper papermania and embossing folder is cottage floral by craft concepts, buttons ribbon and flower from stash
The average container ship can carry about 4,500 containers. This blog was viewed about 24,000 times in 2010. If each view were a shipping container, your blog would have filled about 5 fully loaded ships.
The bannister was occupied by Salvatore, his favored silver tabby,
It’s the hatching season. Not just of the various critters that appear to be attempting to invade the house, but of a new story.
Winning is a perfect combination of masterful parts, nothing cold and no warm rock left uncovered. Find what works and philosophically patent that, go back and tweak and tinker and rev it some more in the downtime, then head right back into that very same game-plan again. “You have figured it out and no one else knows how perfect this will be.”
I did not know that, no wonder Ms. Spalding was so crabby, she didn’t get out enough.
...bring to a boil.
I'm excited to be first in line of the many great challenges and games we have lined up for you this weekend.
43) Obama supported PIPA and FISA and Restricting Internet Freedom; This is stupid because none of those Bills EVER made it out of Congress and who’s to say the President would have signed the Bills if they did? The internet is one of the few places where Real Brothers can actually support the Black President so why would he want to censor one of the few places of his support?
The 2008 “financial crisis” in the United States was a systemic fraud in which the wealthy finance capitalists stole trillions of public dollars. No one was jailed for this crime, the largest theft of public money in history.
Finally the physician should bear in mind that he himself is not exempt from the common lot but is subject to the same laws of mortality and disease as his fellows and he will care for the sick with more diligence and tenderness if he remembers that he himself is their fellow sufferer’.
For example, I remember that my longest writing before high school was a full-length novel (120 pages, give or take) about a group of middle school students who go to a summer camp and, through an espionage-style assault on the enemy’s base with paintball markers, stop the bad guys from doing bad stuff (yes, it was that vague). I had no real friend group at the time, and no one ever read it. I was flying solo without any sort of ground control of readers or editors. I read books like the wind and thought to myself, “I can do this.” I threw the story away later on, dismissing it as “childish” writing. Only now do I realize that it could have easily been salvageable. I could have placed it upon a cookie-cutter plot, a pre-made foundation, and then gone from there. It would not have been difficult to return and “fix-up” the story itself, only as difficult as repairing a house with weak constitution. It was a shack built upon a marsh, and it needed more help than I could provide by myself.
"Honey, shouldn't you know by now? Just because he has a boyfriend doesn't mean the game is over. It only means the game just got more interesting. It's over only when I say it is."
* With laws passed that could open up for lawsuits also outside of the US, savvy companies will start to be proactive when considering defensive or offensive IP acquisitions to strenghten portfolio.
This is why I also never talk about animal cruelty issues like foie gras (I just ate that today wtf) or people torturing kittens/puppies.
suto vadaty eṣa tavendra-śatro
Looking in from the front door you can see the opposite wall is the entrance to the kitchen and dining room with a stupid little closet built right in the middle of it. To the left is a set of stairs going up and going down.
In another hallway in my mind, wandering thought, a wanderlust
¡Alambrista! is available on DVD and Blu-ray.
I’m not even talking about the signing of Lukas Podolski, who has confirmed on his own website (as have his current club FC Köln) that he has signed for Arsenal. Signed. Past tense. It’s been done. Lovely. And we can all say “it seems like Arsenal have learned something from the transfer debacle last year”.
This demoralisation and destruction of the party has had wider ramifications. The activist base has been almost entirely depleted, so that in former strongholds like Kirklees, there are no BNP candidates for the first time in 12 years.
Three Heads
Look, I knew there was a cliffhanger when I started this. And I knew, based on how things were shaping up and how few pages were left, that I would be left hanging at a pretty exciting point.
Yup I said it, no more used games.
Marie Lu and me in Agent Centre
“They don’t?” chortled Lisa. “Now that you mention it, I’ve never seen a guy with a boner busting his gut!”
2. JSP/Servlets
After 3 weeks in primary fermentation at 66-68 degrees it came down to 1.008 which was pretty normal and it had a great yeasty flavors of cloves, anise and black pepper. .It was real tasty as well!
It’s an absolutely brilliant handheld gaming console, held back from true greatness by a few small niggles. Said niggles will no doubt become less of a big deal over time – and the likes of Amazon are already selling the console for less than its list price.
It all started last weekend. I was busy each day & could feel I was fighting a cold. I pushed through because I needed to get ready for my first craft show on Saturday (more on this later). By Tuesday, I was done for and out of commission for the next two days. I'm back to about 95% today, finally!
So are you wondering about our winners from last week? The random winner of a $10 gift certificate to the TE Store is Betty Benton! Congrats!
Shrill, too.
So, Saturday morning we packed up my car, got a drive thru breakfast at Chick-fil-e (and Starbucks for my sweet), and hit the open road. We listened to a mix of his music and my music. We have very different musical tastes. Mine range in the alternative/singer-songerwriter genres... GDA prefers hip-hop and songs with Latino flavor. (Of late, I've been getting into the Latin music scene as well, to help with my salsa dancing.) When listening to music, I count in my head. Additionally, "I'm Sexy and I Know It" by LMFAO (I can't tell you how much this name irks me!) has become our mantra of sorts. We'll be doing whatever, and then GDA will break out with I'm Sexy and I Know It.
Bottom line: Kit Whitfield’s In Great Waters is an impressive accomplishment—with thoroughly thought-out worldbuilding, complex characters, and deep, resounding themes, it’s utterly fascinating and engaging. The ending could be a bit bigger, but that’s not much of a complaint. Read it.
One Hot Pleasure (Sultan and Ned Shepard One Hot Dub) Electronica 125 bpm 7:29
DW: OK, go ahead.
Seen from this angle, the mystery of the Pyramids on the seabed has been resolved. We are simply seeing the results of a cataclysmic earth changing event which resulted in raised sea levels and many lost coastal civilizations. Scientists know more about the surface of the moon then they do about the depths of the earth’s oceans. Perhaps we should follow James Cameron’s lead and start asking more questions about what is really down there – maybe even exploring for ourselves.
For those of you who are starting to notice shadows, pay attention to the B00 and BG93 that I threw into the shadows. I did this to liven up the shadows and liven up the artwork. Note that I also added YR30 and B00 into the highlights. I added the rough sketchy lines in the background to liven those areas up as well. You probably don't notice much of this at first, but it helps to add variety to the whole. I did very little blending on this illustration, except for the purple/gray marker label, and even then I tried to keep it sketchy.
Nemi was also kind enough to send me the photo you see above and point out the EXACT marble that I sent. It is a cheap marble among some very old and classic real marbles. It is now much cooler by association.
Anyway, once I had three kids, I couldn't make the schedule work, so I had to leave the job, but I found my mind and my heart and my memory pulled back into that experience so viscerally, so completely recently, that I could almost smell the cheap cigarettes and the haven't-been-washed-in-four-years black jeans and the yesterday's liquor and Jolly Ranchers that I smelled on those kids every day.
This wasnt a Doctor who things happened to this was a Doctor manipulating and pulling the strings always two steps ahead of his advesaries.
While visions of “Freshly Pressed” danced in their heads.
But to lounge in the sweet fact that it took breath
We need to put an end to this! It isn’t fair! Children across the world are dreading to step out of their houses because they’re scared. Children shouldn’t have to live in fear.
Ginger – green chilli paste: 1-2 tsp / according to taste
Right galliera pm review Artificial Louis Vuitton Handbag base really builds quite a few crash into of any display it’s visibility every single consulting, workshop or even obtaining below smaller population center be the same for.
Popcorn Park Zoo was established in 1977 for the sole purpose of providing a refuge for wildlife that were sick, elderly, abandoned , abused, or injured, and which could no longer survive in its natural habitat. As time went on, we expanded to include exotic and domestic animals. All our residents once faced these circumstances, as well as exploitation and illegal ownership. Over 200 of these animals and birds now live in
Murdoch and Elsa Maclennan: Murdoch is chief exec at the Telegraph Media Group. Donations: £23,000.
This amounts to a radical change to the planning process that has seen the previous planning guidance of more than 1000 pages condensed to a little over 50. The framework has been designed this way to simplify the planning process and application decisions.
I saw something on Facebook today about leaders. Paraphrased: If you inspire and encourage then you are a leader. I agree. Unfortunately, leaders are human and can make mistakes.
For the recipe you'll need eight fabrics-four sets of pairs. The Quilting Connection has the specific amounts and some value guidelines to help the selection process. You can contact our email with any other questions. It will be both fun and easily achievable for a great holiday gift!
Kyle told me what they were doing.
Here is our Christmas card that will be going out soon. We had fun with it this year, especially since the boys were BEYOND silly this year when it came time for Christmas pictures so this worked out for us.
LRA Loughton seems significantly more affected by crime than Debden.
Specifically: 1100, the Number of the Beast in telecoms.
glances from joy filled eyes
It's a little sad. Okay, I'm actually really, really sad writing about how much I used to love that garden and the time and energy I put into it and how beautiful it once was. But even more, I'm really happy now tending more carefully the new ways in which I'm growing and changing and shaping myself. I'm loving the new opportunities that are blooming in my life. Exciting new possibilities are arranging themselves in perfectly timed, beautiful colors.
That's nice. Now I suppose he will expect the same from me. What if I choose to shut down anyway and take the consequences? I think that is likely. It feels better to close it off sometimes. When you are the one doing the closing. So if I do and take the consequences does that mean I am choosing a spanking? And if it does then why would I do that? I've talked before about how I think the whys aren't so important. And maybe the why is just because it feels better after. It's just easier.
The Things a Brother Knows by Dana Reinhardt
Nor does Jacobs solely document a year spent sitting on a couch reading. Whilst reading the Britannica, he also travels to Britannica headquarters, joins Mensa, interviews the founder of several high-IQ societies and is a contestant on Who Wants to Be A Millionaire? Yet somehow his anecdotes—undoubtedly an attempt to turn a rather isolating experience into something other people can appreciate—don’t quite manage to make his mission exciting. In fact, one of the central themes in Jacobs’ writing is how infrequently other people—his wife included—appreciate incessant sharing of interesting yet generally irrelevant facts.
One of MCA’s great boasts is that of the Tunku Abdul Rahman College and University.
I look forward to reading your reviews this month!
The trouble was now we were half an hour early. We stuck our head in the restaurant and said “tienamos una reserve” and this is where we got stuck. We tried “Mirta” blank faces, “Roger y Mirta” still blank. “Mirta Gamboa” nope; “Quantas personas” the guy said, “no tengo ningun idea” I said. Stalemate, nothing left but to stand and wait.
We will never tolerate segregation, and the law is on our side on that one. The segregationists/gender queer and cross dressing activists need not to co-opt us anymore, it's unethical and a violation of our rights for them to demand that we misgender ourselves into a third gender "anti-binary" rebellion. We simply are aligned with the binary, like a large percentage of the world.
Take advantage of the $289 Starter kit special!
The U.S. Department of State forwards complete and eligible Hague Abduction Convention applications to the Ministry of Justice. The Ministry of Justice then forwards the applications to the appropriate Public Prosecutor attached to the civil court of general jurisdiction in the jurisdiction where the defendant resides. The Prosecutor brings the case on behalf of France; parents or legal guardian and other parties (e.g., the child) have the right to their own counsel (legal aid is only available to French citizens). A list of attorneys compiled by the U.S. Embassy in France is available through the U.S. Embassy website. Please note that referral of the listed attorneys, law firms, or legal aid organizations do not constitute an endorsement or recommendation of the U.S. Department of State. The Department of State assumes no responsibility for the professional ability, performance or integrity of these attorneys. The order in which the names appear has no significance.
4-6 May 2012
Aguero’s workrate, Tevez’ skill…Tevez’ workrate, Aguero’s skill, Clichy’s pace, Silva’s passing, Kompany’s defending, Lescott’s heading, Zabaleta’s engine, De Jong’s presence…ALL pretty special.
mistake of sneezing when the king was speaking, he was strangled on
Our chat was at Urban Coffee Shop and it was my first time there as I don’t drink coffee. After much ado, I found the shop and waited for Rosie to show up. As soon as she worked in I knew she was the one because she got the “bohemian” look just right. And we got chatting. She said she had been dancing since she was a child, following the movements of the waves by the beach and eventually in a ballet class. Her commitment to dance however, started when she had an imaginative teacher that taught them to “move like cats” or come up with their own moves.
summer. She would dress me up and use me to impress her friends with
If you’re like me, living across The Pond, you may have heard news stories about European “football” (rugby) teams and how violent and reactionary their fans can get. And if you’re like me (or even if you actually enjoy sports), you have to wonder what all the fuss is about.
Here are some ways I’ve been combating this little travel bug:
1 cup parmesan cheese
But when Vika arrived at her first orphanage, the workers gave her a birth date and guessed at her age; as she was found on the street with a mom who never claimed her, the exact information was never known. She was given the birthdate of January 19 and it was estimated she was around seven years old.
Step behind him in line, your eyes again meet
Id mention the time I spent all day on my knees with my roommate. Both armed with some cleansing alcohol and a loofa. A metallic scraper and two boxes of tissue paper.elbow deep in fading acrylic paint and high as a kit on the fumes.
So that's about it! Thank you for coming on this long needleturn ride with me. Please don't hesitate to ask any questions, I'm not that good at writing clear instructions so I'm hoping I haven't confused more than helped, but it has been fun xo
Accommodation + full board (three meals a day) only 25 euro per person / day.
V.A. - Melancholiedjes 2 (The second Belgian and Dutch compilation)
“Algar’s a great person and there was no reason for you to mess with my social life,” Sybil growled.
Last week, or well I guess it was this week, being that it's still Saturday and all, a bunch of us went to a place in Cincinnati that I have only heard tales of. I have been wanting to see if it could be true for the longest time, really a place that makes homemade root beer?
I do have some things I'd like to do this year, but I haven't really spent too much time thinking about it.
The difference is that John McCain stared at the juggernaut of history bearing down upon him, and threw a Hail Mary, while Newt Gingrich imagines himself the juggernaut of history poised to sweep civilization, and throws a Hail Mary hoping how well he thinks of himself will be contagious.
Imagine being given an ice cold drink. A cocktail, a soft drink, or even a beer (though I don’t personally like them). You’re given a coaster to catch the condensation before it hits the table. But this coaster is different.
Let's start with my mornings. I sleep on a futon, which isn't too uncomfortable, actually. It's a good bit firmer than I'm used to, but that isn't a problem. However, I think my pillow is too firm for my sleeping habits, and I'll probably go to Ikea and get a softer one. I try to get up around 9 now, though I slept in until 11 this morning (I've been quite tired). I fold up my sheets and pick up my mattress to lean it against the wall. This helps it dry out to avoid mold. I've been doing this since day one, as I had been warned that it can develop mold. (At my recent follow-up training, I heard from one of the other trainees that she had not been doing this and already started developing a mold of some sort! The fix seems to be some kind of bleach spray, followed by vacuuming. I want this spray just for a precaution.)
He settled for a stiff nod to acknowledge her apology, and realised he didn't know where to begin. Why had he gotten so upset with Dora's quip? It was rude of the Four Knot to suggest he might find a Wilder attractive, but he couldn't exactly explain that to Taslin. He bit his lip, caught himself doing it, and stopped, feeling the odd urge to cover his mouth to make sure he didn't do it again. Instead, he clenched a fist, and said, "Sorry, could you repeat the question? I've lost track."
Our paths crossed by the amazing paradigm of the Internet.......she stumbled upon me because of my sweet little earth Angel Emma Sage and my blogging and capturing her life in photographs and words.
It was always the “in” thing, to have a clean, fancy, shiny bicycle. Bicycles to us kids in those days were much like cars in the years to come; a necessary mode of transportation, much more so than they were to my own children. I would often visit the local Schwinn bicycle shop not far away to look at, to dream of and to plan for bigger and more expensive models. Sometime when I was about 13, I owned a Schwinn Stingray, with it’s high-rise handlebars, a 20 inch rear tire with a smaller one up front, a banana seat and a five-speed shifter on the bar between my legs. I became pretty efficient at pulling “wheelies” with it and could travel half a block or more before losing momentum. Eventually I would graduate to a 26 inch ten-speed before my days as a kid, riding bikes with my friends, would come to an end.
P raise can do alone.
The Waste Land, by T. S. Eliot
Numb is forced to more or less prostitute himself by letting people put nails in him. Just like so many other people he didn't know any other way to survive. First he was part of the freak show in the circus and then on to a different kind of freak show in New York.
And the devil in disguise.
The third element is the creation of depth using increasing dark values as you get to back of the ship. The idea is to try and make it look as though the Titanic is coming out of the dark into the light.
I wanted to take the time to wish all my new friends from MUIB a hearty hello! I’ve added a blog roll over on the right for the amazing blogs authored by these women. Please take a moment to take a look at the wide variety of topics covered in depth here. Please check back frequently as we are a busy group and post often!!
Over the years, I've had boots with lace-ups, no lace ups, big stumpy platforms, buckles, and heels of various heights. They are always knee length and black, that's a constant.
WHADDYA, KNOW: This will take a circuitous route to a point about receiver standards, starting with quote from the “Middle Class Tax Relief and Job Creation Act of 2012.”
Latinos (Govs. Sandoval and Martinez; various Senators) and Asian-Americans (Govs. Haley and Jindal; Sens. Inouye and Akaka) have had more success in recent years, despite similar problems — gerrymandering, for example.
The Roman Catholic Church had just begun its Counter-Reformation, a reaction against the successful Reformation of the Protestant Church and the Thirty Years War began. Galileo was strangely naive about politics. He felt that he could outwit the Church, which had made the country almost a police state, because he was so clever. But logical thinking and truth were the enemies of Faith and anyone who didn’t agree was, a heretic.
And my nails...well lets just say I still gotta 'em.
and I am waiting for a rebirth of wonder and I am waiting for someone to really discover America and wail and I am waiting for the discovery Of a new symbolic western frontier and I am waiting for the American Eagle to really spread its wings and straighten up and fly right and I am waiting for the Age of Anxiety to drop dead and I am waiting for the war to be fought which will make the world safe for anarchy and I am waiting for the final withering away of all governments and I am perpetually awaiting a rebirth of wonder I am waiting for the second coming And I am waiting For a religious revival To sweep thru the state of Arizona And I am waiting For the grapes of wrath to stored And I am waiting For them to prove That God is really American And I am waiting To see God on television Piped into church altars If they can find The right channel To tune it in on And I am waiting for the last supper to be served again and a strange new appetizer and I am perpetually awaiting a rebirth of wonder I am waiting for my number to be called and I am waiting for the Salvation Army to take over and I am waiting for the meek to be blessed and inherit the earth without taxes and I am waiting for forests and animals to reclaim the earth as theirs and I am waiting for a way to be devised to destroy all nationalisms without killing anybody and I am waiting for linnets and planets to fall like rain and I am waiting for lovers and weepers to lie down together again in a new rebirth of wonder I am waiting for the great divide to be crossed and I anxiously waiting For the secret of eternal life to be discovered By an obscure practitioner and I am waiting for the storms of life to be over and I am waiting to set sail for happiness and I am waiting for a reconstructed Mayflower to reach America with its picture story and TV rights sold in advance to the natives and I am waiting for the lost music to sound again in the Lost Continent in a new rebirth of wonder I am waiting for the day that maketh all things clear and I am waiting for retribution for what America did to Tom Sawyer and I am waiting for the American Boy to take off Beauty's clothes and get on top of her and I am waiting for Alice in Wonderland to retransmit to me her total dream of innocence and I am waiting for Childe Roland to come to the final darkest tower and I am waiting for Aphrodite to grow live arms at a final disarmament conference in a new rebirth of wonder I am waiting to get some intimations of immortality by recollecting my early childhood and I am waiting for the green mornings to come again for some strains of unpremeditated art to shake my typewriter and I am waiting to write the great indelible poem and I am waiting for the last long rapture and I am perpetually waiting for the fleeting lovers on the Grecian Urn to catch each other at last and embrace and I am awaiting perpetually and forever
My husband dusted off Betsey and filled the brittle tires with air. The hard narrow seat hurt, and the squeaky brakes annoyed me, but the bike still worked, so off I went. Since Salem has some Greenways not far from the shop, I figured it would be an ideal location to give it a spin. So I rode along the path I usually walk. The worst part was getting to the path as I had to walk the bike up a rather steep hill and across a bridge dodging traffic on Colorado. I was out of breath by the time I even got to the Greenway.
Showcase Different Sides of Your Biz
On our way back the clouds lifted away from the top of the nearby mountain and we caught a glimpse of part of Machu Picchu from afar. It made me that much more excited for tomorrow. Aguas Calientes is in a valley by the river, whereas Machu Picchu is at the top of a mountain. It's quite the climb to get up there; the buses go through a series of switchbacks. We could see them going up and down from where we were.
Liking this more and more, Grayson nodded to himself with no thought to Doyle’s cautioning advice. Making it up as it came to him, he went on with enthusiastic abandon. “I know who kidnapped her, or at least, who arranged it. It’s doubtful that he came here himself. I suspect he sent someone to do it for him.”
The film has no textual titles except brief ones at the beginning and before the tacked-on, studio-mandated epilogue. Murnau and screenwriter Carl Mayer convey everything entirely through visuals, through performances. The complete lack of dialogue text is very refreshing, preventing the film from getting bogged down in endless reading breaks between images. Even in the one scene where Murnau uses text within the mise en scène, this text isn't simply a static paragraph. The porter learns of his demotion to restroom attendant through a letter, and Murnau displays this letter onscreen. But when the porter gets to the part that is for him the key phrase — the humiliating line that attributes this change to his "age and frailty" — the camera tracks along the words, following his eye as he takes in this disheartening phrase. The image then begins to blur, as if with tears, confirming that this is the first subjective shot in the film — and the first subjective shot in the then-short history of moving pictures! Even with the novelty long since faded, shots like this are incredibly affecting and bracing, as are the graceful tracking shots that zero in on the porter's distraught face at key moments.
We live in a society where food prices are set to go only one way: up. We also live in a society (at least in the UK) where all the land has been divided up between a handful of the people. Only 3% of land in the UK today is common land. Both land and property are becoming further and further out of the reach of ordinary people. We are forced instead to be completely dependent on the mercy of landlords, our money pouring out of our accounts into their pockets with nothing of our own to show for it. We a bundled closer and closer together into smaller and smaller apartments and flats where it becomes difficult to grow or produce anything which makes us completely at the mercy of the supermarkets and agribusiness. We are not a free people anymore, we are unable to affect change, we are unable to chose a path of self-sufficiency and we are subject to a great many market forces beyond our control.
When it comes to blogger, I love the various new views they have, but they don't have the support yet for custom widgets, which I don't want to totally abandon yet. So what's a blogger to do?
(This is where I get worried that my son is posessed)
I have no idea what I want to be when I grow up. Honestly. I only ever wanted to be a teacher. Now I've meet that mark and I'm good at it. It seems crazy to just stick around status-quo, right? So what do I do next? I'm not interested in becoming an administrator, mostly because I understand how intensely frustrating that job that can be without the right funds or support from your superiors. I'm not eager to get another degree in English, because I already have a hard enough time finding other ways (than teaching) to use my B.A. degree.
In the morning I had my valise packed, waiting outside the door to the beach-house. I wanted to be anywhere but inside my own crawling flesh. But she had been unfaithful, so why was I to leave? We agreed to find separate homes and when I left the solitude of Lakeview Drive, I moved into a bustling, dysfunctional community on East Cliff Drive, a house and cabins on a giant lot where 14 people lived and ate together. (Today, Lakeview is paved and the little house has made way for a choked row of overpriced condos.)
The Continental GT’s infotainment system is every bit as compact, powerful and technologically advanced as the cars that houses it. As standard the Continental GT comes with an eight channel, eight speaker system, with 15GB of storage for music. Music can be played via an iPod, MP3 player, the car’s own six-disc CD changer or even an SD card.
But then we got on top of the dye thing, and it started to feel pretty easy. I was just thankful that food dyes were my only foray into restricted diets and that I didn’t have to worry about any of the HARD stuff. Like peanuts. Or dairy. Or gluten.
The examples generally used to support this sort of argument typically involve animals with different sensory capabilities than our own, like Thomas Nagel's bat (Nagel did not use his bat argument for the point I am making here.) The bat has poorer vision than us, but instead has a highly refined sonar system it uses to echolocate its prey. What must it be like, Nagel asks, to be a bat? What is a "bat's world" like? We can hardly imagine it, but by what right do we claim that our world is the "real world" in contrast to the bat's? If these sorts of examples impress us as support for Kant's views, we should remember that Kant himself did not argue from them. For if Kant is right, then what we call a "bat" is only a construction our consciousness puts on sense impressions. Imagining what it is like to be a bat is just another way of exploring our own consciousness, not a magic way to explore the possibilities of some other consciousness.
“You got no right to beat on the brat, asshole,” I tell him. “Not with a fucking baseball bat.”
Arkle Chase and went on to add the Queen Mother Champion Chase in 2003 and 2005, as well as a host of other championship races including the Grade One John Smith’s Melling Chase at Aintree in 2004 and 2005. He crowned the 2002/03 season with victory in the John Smith’s Grand National aboard Monty’s Pass, something which contributed to him being voted RTE Sports Personality of the year by Irish television viewers. He captured the 2005 Cheltenham Gold Cup on the Tom Taaffe-trained Kicking King the day after Moscow Flyer’s emotional second Queen Mother Champion Chase triumph. In total, he has enjoyed 25 victories at the Cheltenham Festival. Geraghty teamed up with Lambourn trainer Nicky Henderson at the start of the 2008/09 season, splitting his time between Ireland and Britain. Geraghty’s association with Henderson has already yielded a Champion Hurdle victory in 2009 with Punjabi and he was top jockey at The Festival in 2012 with five success including the Queen Mother Champion Chase on Finian’s Rainbow. John Smith’s Grand National Record: 2000 Call It A Day (6th); 2001 Hanakham (Fell 2nd); 2002 Alexander Banquet (Unseated 6th); 2003 MONTY’S PASS (WON); 2004 Monty’s Pass (4th); 2005 Monty’s Pass (16th); 2006 Puntal (6th); 2007 Slim Pickings (3rd); 2008 Slim Pickings (4th); 2009 Golden Flight (Fell 1st); 2010 Big Fella Thanks (4th); 2011 Or Noir De Somoza (Fell 6th)
Turmeric Powder - 1/4 tsp
My work is looking beyond the pure documentation of a state for the transient and personal intermediate spaces, which are hidden in every situation and action.
How do you set the limit?
After The Beast, Ray Harryhausen was on a roll: It Came from Beneath the Sea, 20 Million Miles to Earth, Earth vs. the Flying Saucers. But in 1958 he, producer Charles Schneer and director Nathan Juran made a picture that represented an orders-of-magnitude leap forward on the keen-and-neat-o scale.
Please link your creations below by Sunday, April 8th to play along. Winner and Tea Time Terrific Top Three will be announced Monday, April 9th. We will have an all-new challenge for you to play along with on the 9th as well, so please come back and visit with us again for another chance to win!
An open letter to our young undergrads — Tay Tian Yan – April 18, 2012
1 small onion, diced
Thanks for following this journey!
Overall I have done 77 runs, over a total of 390 miles. I’ve cross-trained a total of 79 miles over 22 occasions. I’ve used 49,000 calories and climbed 6000 feet of elevation. Total exercise time of just under 74 hours. I did set myself the goal of virtually ‘running’ from Land’s End to John O’Groats, and I’m a bit behind schedule, with 381 miles to do in 137 days… I’d better get back into training mode!
In a manifesto he published online before the attacks, Breivik wrote that “patriotic resistance fighters” should use trials “as a platform to further our cause.”
Baseball! Slightly overcast and chilly for most of game. We had a rough start but came back from behind by 9 runs to win with bases loaded in the pouring rain! Go team go!
none leading to what I need.
I am not a demonstrator, but if anyone wants to know where to buy SU from I know a couple of lovely ladies you can place your orders with.
from our souls.
I have been trying to study Japaneese and I have been CRYING………….. Big sigh!
The new album will be released this fall.
Happy Friday! Hope you all are ready for a wonderful weekend! Emmy is headed to Gramma's tomorrow to see a ballet of Sleeping Beauty. Chris is away golfing with his brother for the weekend, so I have a date with my favorite boy, Sawyer. We are going to head to his soccer game, have some lunch, and we are going to have a glorious afternoon together. We plan to play Star Wars Trouble, take Jake for a long walk, and then snuggle on the couch for a movie night. Sunday morning he and I are going to try out another church where some of his schoolmates worship, so we are looking forward to that! I am super excited for some one on one time with my little man.
Tomato - 1 medium or 2 small chopped
If I contemplate all this too long it makes my head spin. I get the same feeling when looking upwards into a clear night's sky contemplating my place in the universe. My head lightens when my mind takes to places of such vast wonderment. As a human, I don't have the capability to fully comprehend the universe. As a mother, I can't fully comprehend how we are no longer the center of his.
The account in Acts takes up with the last day the Lord spent on earth and His last words to the apostles. To introduce this birth of history it would be right to see some of the infallible proofs of the physical resurrection of Jesus. He writes, “He shewed himself alive. . .by many infallible proofs.” What were some of these proofs?
petitions and every sharp
Loraine Angela Razon
The answer is: Yes, wholeheartedly yes!
You are not even aware of these thoughts, consciously, and they affect your success. It can be very difficult to discover these limitations by yourself. You can, but when you are caught up in your way of doing things – you accept them as being the only way to do it.
"My kids have never really seen me smile. My husband says he misses it,"
The week has flown by again and at Sugar Creek Hollow we have another SHABBY CHIC/VINTAGE/PRIMATIVE challenge for you......there were lots of lovely entries for last week well done to you all.
In case you didn’t know, the cheddar bagel is a plain bagel that has been baked with cheddar cheese on top. The cheese gets nice and crispy on top and then congeals and pools in the centre of the bagel. It’s absolutely delicious. Also, there is more than one take on a cheesy-esque bagel. There is also the Asiago bagel, which, I don’t care for as much because the cheese is far too overwhelming during those two middle bites, but it’s a worthy substitute when the bakery runs out of cheddar bagels. Cheddar bagels are delicious. It doesn’t matter if you eat them 6 hours after a trip to the bakery, 1 day later, or 2 days after the fact (though, they never last longer than 6 hours in my household, they’re too darn good), you don’t have to reheat them, slice them down the middle and put cream cheese on them or anything. Just take from the bag you stored them in and have a big, healthy bite. They ooze of cheese and happiness. It’d be divine bliss to have one with a cup of Starbucks (must be why there’s a Starbucks right across the street from the bakery), honestly.
“Since my D-1 clock is up, I was speaking to some D-2 schools about playing for them but it was too late to apply there as well so for the time being I will train here in Hawaii and get ready for Pro Day,” he said.
Two bros from Home Town Hero hooked up with Audiovent's drummer and made some funkay music together in 2006, resulting in one of the few quintessential pop/rock/funk albums of the Noughties. Sounds pretty good, capiche?
at my blog 50 times since yesterday morning. I told her I was
His last really good day was my wedding. He died four months later.
Make sure it is just the 2 of you. If his mates are over, it probably won’t be as romantic as you had hoped.
I love these cookies...they have some different ingredients in them and the taste wonderful!
*I used apricot nectar, because it's the closest thing I could find, and although I only needed a half-cup, it came in a little six-pack. I figure I'll use the rest of it in other marinades.
So, what is the process of becoming a dog trainer? Who do you talk to, what school do you enroll in? Keeping in mind that the field of dog training is not regulated, extreme caution is warranted when choosing an educational route. Some of the best trainers are self-taught. They start by training their own dogs, then the dogs of family, friends and neighbors. They read the latest and greatest training books, they attend seminars. Then they begin taking paid clients.
Don’t get me wrong, I LOVE my job. Love. And I ADORE my students. ADORE. And I never complain about any of it, because I love it all. But when some douchebags who have never done this job complains about how we’re overcompensated, well then, objectively, there’s a lot to complain about, and I could go on. So please stop me or I’ll have a hernia.
Looking forward to the slew of holidays (Haloween, Thanksgiving, Christmas, New Years) that are coming up sooner than expected.
For Brothers & Sisters Who Chose Life – When Death Was Not an Option – Choreopoem mashup of Ntozake Shange’s for colored girls who have considered suicide/when the rainbow is enuf and Keith Antar Mason’s …for black boys who have considered homicide when the streets were too much…. This week: Friday and Saturday 8:00, Sunday 2:00. Continues through April 22. Farrison-Newton Building, NCCU Campus, Durham.
Translation: Ask the new people you meet about themselves. When in a group or at a party, listen carefully to the conversation. See where you might be able to jump in. It may be something as simple as an exclamation, “You’re kidding me!” that gets the ball rolling.
23 pause 0:55
The prosecution, which followed a Customs seizure, indicates that, while the public authorities in many countries are often reluctant to utilise public resources in order to enforce private rights, the Spanish authorities have shown themselves to be decisive in not only securing conviction but resisting the appeal.
Hello readers new and old! Some of my favorite or most remarked upon posts the past two years of FFIMS, w/commentary.Somewhat emphasizing the early stuff, when I was really trying to essay, some of the oomph or viscera at least or feeling behind it going into the book Heroines, out in September.
Grrr...
So what does this work cover? As the publisher's web blurb indicates:
A little bit vintage with a touch of Grunge..
I thought about this a lot on one of my recent visits to see my family, as I revisited my old stomping grounds and supermarkets I used to shop in. In the middle of the day, the suburban grocery stores were so vast and empty of shoppers, the air conditioning blasting through the sliding front doors as we entered, the shopping carts tremendous, and the aisles mostly filled with lots of processed foods I never knew existed. Our little markets don't have room for the plethora of prepackaged crap out there, so they need to be discerning too.
Nellie's photograph is my image of what an ideal summer should be (I've overused 'perfect' so I can't possibly use it again!)
First, Dr. King relies heavily upon the idea that we love our enemies because God or Jesus loves them. At the core of these assertions, I believe, is not any sort of construct about God being a personality or a father figure or Jesus his sole manifestation in the flesh, but the more fundamental truth of human unity. The more fundamental idea that we members of this human species are brothers and sisters, children of the same universe. The more fundamental idea that our similarities are greater than our differences and that we ultimately struggle for the same things: life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.
Like The Shard it aims for the new elitism – “a rich mix of slick residential apartments, exclusive retail, extensive office space, boutique hotel, private spa, a hi-tech automated car park and the city’s first rooftop restaurant reside.” Upmarket is the American term which refers to what we would in England describe as vulgar: money without taste.
There are good arguments for and against reforming the upper chamber. Many are opposed to the very principle of an unelected House of Parliament – a practice present in only 15 other countries worldwide. Others are concerned that an elected second house would result in US senate-style gridlock, and highlight the good – if mostly invisible – work of peers like Jane Campell and Dee Doocey in opposing the Government’s regressive welfare and legal aid cuts. Some like Polly Toynbee have called for the abolition of the House altogether.
Khavi Mavodze writes (second picture below) : “The World (cup) is over please foreigners leave our country and take your brother Perreira along, we don’t care even if his bank account is loaded with South African money, as for you ref, be warned, xenophobia is our first name…’ Percy Masete agrees, writing: ‘if we don’t make it to the next round, all the foreigners must go…’
What seems to be the problem?
Make the moment,
Although there is no charge for this chart, a donation to the MS Trust for this chart would be appreciated. Pennies will do - and you can make a donation by clicking here
This year, the girls are coming to my house because they haven’t yet visited me in my new place. We plan to hit a nearby outlet mall and take a float trip on the river. I’m going to cook something really yummy for them and show them the sights in our scenic new home, and I’m sure the seven of us will camp out in my den until the wee hours laughing and being girls.
For spicy, add the grated Serrano to the lemon juice - blend well - with a whisk or a hand blender/mixer. Then add all your ingredients.
You might even subscribe to an online archive service that automatically backs up your computer data on a regular basis. These are fine for some people, but they can be very expensive, and you have to make sure your computer is turned on and online when the regularly scheduled backup takes place. You also have to remember to renew your annual subscription to this kind of service or guess what? Your photos will be deleted from their storage space for non-payment.
Headed for the historic town of Richmond (about 30 minutes out of Hobart in the direction of the airport).
We are bringing our workout gear and are hoping for a few trail runs while we're there!
It’s quiet, very quiet. Still there is no one else around; most are off on summer holidays as I have these milestone moments. I know the world should and does carry on; I am but a speck, a colourful speck but a speck all the same in a vast wilderness of people, strangers. I cannot sleep, every morning, or night I wake at around 3am. This morning I just lay there trying to rationalise my fear. I have given up my job, how will I live? How will I pay the mortgage, have electrolysis, pay, pay, pay, do, do, do! Then I realised that it was all taking place anyway, it had a slight beat now, a pulse, a life outside and beyond my fear. I just lay there and planned outfits, haircuts, hair colour, shoes, boots, I closed my eyes and for the first time there I was standing in front of me looking just fine. Like a proud forty plus woman who had a career, style and would soon have a vagina. I watched me walk through my life, teaching, shopping, and laughing. I realised that as long as I kept breathing it would be fine, the morning would come, I would be tired and I would get up and face the day and be one step closer to me. Breathing allows the pulse of this thing to beat with a newly acquired regularity, my transformation has calmed down; relaxed I slept.
because they had shown me.............
Describing a crime so vast is ugly work, to open this ghastly casket is to expose a massive rank and sulphurous morass of tangled conspiracies, lies and plots, some dating back two centuries or more, mingling with others which are far more recent. There are many half formed, ill conceived which have been long abandoned, but others, chilling in their cold hearted and deliberate brilliance, still gnaw away at the substance and foundations of the common and ancient prey. To look too deeply into what is taking place is to glimpse an evil in the souls of our fellow men which is not easy or comfortable to contemplate, and it for that reason too that I have chosen to put this subject to one side for a while.
The mystery is also largely rendered irrelevant by the sense that the film is really exploring the distorting effects of memory, the ways in which memory can lie and obscure rather than revealing the truth. Resnais is concerned with the selectivity of memory, and for much of the film several key scenes are occluded, perhaps because Claude is on some level subconsciously directing the images that flash before his eyes. At other times, it seems like his memory is rebelling against the staid confines of reality, creating surreal disjunctions and weird interludes that suggest that not only can memory lie, it can go mad.
The stern lifeboats, four on the port and four on the starboard side, had already left the ship. One of the first boats to leave carried only 12 people, Sir Cosmo and Lady Duff Gordon, and 10 others. Most of the boats were loaded with about 40 to 45, with the exception of the last few to go, which were loaded to full capacity.
Grace be to you and peace, from God: our Father, and The LORD Jesus Christ.
Fish Girl, who now knows that the Fools are from the past, teaches them to adjust to modern life. Anyway, the episode is ending which means it’s time for a cliffhanger. Because this drama is full of contrivances, Park Ha’s stepmom gets her to help empty out Tae Yong’s room. This means she gets to drag Crown Prince along with her. Which means that somehow, he gets to go into the house and into room and gets shocked when he sees one of Micky’s DBSK posters. Oh noes! Not only is Crown Princess in the modern world, so is he!
Chick Gandil - Chino
So um yeah:
Cox plays Avery Ludlow, a reclusive widower who lives a quiet life of fishing and relaxing with dog Red. During one fateful fishing trip, Ludlow and Red happen across a trio of delinquent youths who attempt to rob the old man. Out of spite, the most vicious of the kids (Fisher) shoots Red dead in the head. Seeking justice, Ludlow finds the boys' respective parents and appeals for them to do the right thing. The brats deny everything and the parents simply dismiss poor Ludlow. Still though, the old chap doesn't go as Harry Brown as one might expect. This is no average old-bloke-on-the-rampage movie.
The Bloomington brewery has six beers on draft. They are available for sampling and growler fills (a growler is a container, usually glass, that is filled off of draft lines for at-home consumption; they generally come in 64 ounce containers, but some places have 32 ounce as well). Kegs are also available for sale. Pints of their beer are sold only on Sundays and Mondays.
To make sure this book holds together and is a durable storage solution, I used the Unibind Wire Binding Machine. It's very easy to use and heavy duty...the bind will last. In the photo below you'll see me punching the holes for the wires...the machine has adjustable die cutting pins that allow for a variety of sizes and wires. It's very useful and versatile.
TD: One of the benefits of being a member of EFactor is that you’re connected with all kinds of specialist within one mouse click. Being a member of a group of likeminded people means it is easy to share your skills, knowledge and expertise and you can expect the same from other members. Executive coaching can be an accelerator of your business growth as well as your personal development. I’m always willing to share and support whenever I can. When my input leads to a desire to sign up to a more intensive and tailor made coaching program, all the better. That’s how I make a living. Since my clients report a ROI of 629%, they are making a better living from it as well.
John McCain said “If Congress does not act, American taxpayers will continue to be exposed to the enormous risk that Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac pose to the housing market, the overall financial system, and the economy as a whole.” PDF of Congressional Record (center column)
I believe that “less” actually is “more” so strongly that if you don’t anticipate discovering your spouse has been leading a double life, is heading to prison and that the U.S. Marshalls are going to help you “clean out” and “declutter” your life of “things” in the very near future, I highly recommend you do it on your own— although perhaps not to the extent my life was “decluttered”! (lol)
“Trying not to mess up that bod huh?” She looked me up and down like a piece of cake at a Weight Watchers convention. “Why did you come through the window?”
d. Ryan Reynolds after his transformation
Here it is closed. I just used sew-on velcro.
Paymar has been a strong advocate of gun control, socialized health care and of measures to combat domestic violence. The last is a very worthy cause, but is one often hi-jacked by feminists and socialists to extract money from government and foundations and to denigrate men and masculine institutions.
Wander around an empty New York City in the company of Will Smith and his doggy. Play golf on an aircraft carrier and talk to a shop dummy while picking up a film at a deserted Blockbuster. You'd be better off reading the book for a better ending (the mutants are now normal society and he is the monster). Best bit of the film is Will singing to his dog.
LINK UP YOUR $10 CRAFT OR RECIPE! Please play fair and copy the Ten Buck Tuesday button to your blog when you link up! The link-up will be open until next Monday at 11:59pm (EST)! No shops or main pages; please link up the specific post of your project.
About ten minutes later, a very nicely dressed young adult approached us wearing suit, I thought, “well he may not have parents with him, but this kid is ready to represent himself.”
But these chemicals are also particularly potent hormone disrupters. And approximately 76 percent of the fragrances tested in the Not So Sexy report contained at least one of them.
Ryker had his first baseball game today. I’m not super into sports, but any opportunity to get amazing pictures I will jump right in. I don’t mean to self absorbed when I say god-damn this is a great picture.
I look at her and see that she was the exterior wall of the fortress that protected me from a lifetime of pain. She was the buffer. She’s the one who stepped in and took all of the hits, and absorbed all of the shocks and insults. She’s the one who stepped onto the plane and flew across the country to take care of whichever loved one was dying. She always found a way even when a way seemed impossible. She not only took care of me, but the entire world she knew. She’d gotten oh so very tired. It’s an exhaustion that I still feel. It was a terribly thankless job. She carried all of the pain and kept me smiling a fake smile, and moving through life in the best, muddled, way that I could.
Passwords
You think it is just beginning,
A recent find by Richard K. covers several Christian Endeavor subjects. Bible study is certainly one. So is prayer; and the famous evangelist and Christian Endeavor influence Dwight L. Moody wrote on the importance of prayer meetings in his title Golden Counsels in his chapter, “How to Have a Good Prayer Meeting’ (D. L. Moody. Golden Counsels. Boston: United Society of Christian Endeavor, 1899, pp. 27-33).
We found all three elements at The Alchemist on Brunswick Street, Fitzroy.
Happy revising!
I am hearing Seidner ads on the radio, the ones featuring Patty Berg but so far I am not hearing any compelling reason why I should support Seidner. Just feel good stuff. It is not enough.
13.Acceptance
“You should have gone there yesterday while the footy was on,” he smugged.
Because Mersault has become an object of derision for the crowd, he understands that they do not fully grasp his particular humanity, his agency. For them, he is merely a vessel into which to pour their malign engagement. The crowd, unlike either Mersault or the ‘benign indifference’ of the universe with which he feels so closely bonded, is intensely aroused and judgemental. They have found a type of meaning in directing their anger towards a person, an idea – even if it is a false one. He, and the universe in which he has finally found a brotherhood, has been fatally misunderstood.
We began our journey to Fairyland in Keswick (KEZ-ick) in the North Lake District. This is how the world looked out of our hotel window when we awoke. Not very auspicious when it rained on and off all day the day before and then here all that sogginess is again. But then again, the misty mountains look otherworldly. What awaits us in those hills?
I am still really into the DIY and thrifting mood…maybe to do with the creativity and the fun of the hunt, but anyways I stumbled across this video on YouTube and I so need to make myself a pair! I know that I will have to find a pair of cowboy boots in my size at the thrift store (easier said then done, methinks), but so fun and I do love booties…yay!
-Drain the water and squeeze out the excess water.Keep aside.
The North End Neighbours, who have appealed the matter being heard before OMB chair Harold Goldkind, says it doesn’t. The group, through their lawyer Herman Turkstra, want speed limit reductions from 50 kilometres an hour to 30 km/h on Burlington Street East, Wellington Street, Ferguson Avenue, John Street and James Street, a redesignation of Bay Street North from collector to local road status and other traffic measures to safeguard the neighbourhood’s 1,200 children.
2. No flour added to thicken the jam
( a salt scrub dries out our skin...its salt, makes sense right :-)
Outside food sources that attract rodents include garbage, dog and cat food, dog feces, birdseed, and fruits or berries that have fallen to the ground. Take away their sources of food outside, and rodents will look for another neighborhood to live. Pick up fruit and vegetables in your yard. A honeycomb can feed hundreds of mice all winter, so carefully remove any beehives in the immediate area. Birds are messy eaters, which is especially helpful to rodents. So quit feeding the birds for the duration of the infestation. If you’re feeding the squirrels; you’re also feeding rodents. If at all possible, feed your pets indoors. If you must feed your pets outside, remove their food 30 minutes after serving. Otherwise, whatever you’re pet doesn’t eat, rodents will. Since rats are nocturnal, feed your outdoor pet well before dark.
Catalog Number:1541 AS
Top 50 aka #11-50 (boys: 19, girls: 8)
With the NFL draft just days away, highly valued quarterback prospects certainly don't want their names associated with Leaf.
Firstly, I managed to do a full seven days of morning pages and the 2hr Artist Date that I was so stressed about. In fact, I managed to find several opportunities to date my inner artist throughout the week so that's proven that I do have available time and I can be more productive if I choose to take that time for my creativity. Nobody died. Nobody starved to death. The house didn't fall down. Mr W didn't leave me. It was okay.
I can get tickets for Carmen On Tap once they start Actually Advertising them (closer to July, when the next show runs), and take my girlfriend out for a Fabulous Evening. (There will be primping. Oh, yes. There will be primping).
One autumn, a few years after we met a change came over my friend. She stopped calling and wouldn’t answer my calls or return them. Her daughters did the same to my daughters. If I went to her house, she wouldn’t answer the door. But if we saw each other socially and I spoke to her, she seemed her normal witty self. I wasn’t sure if she was avoiding me or if I was imagining it.
For the first two rounds, this one was all Riley. For ten-plus minutes, Riley backed Griffin down, took him down and hung all over him, brutalizing him with ground and pound. At the end of the second round, Riley very nearly got the finish by way of a rear-naked choke.
Readers acquainted with Anaya s fiction will find themselves in familiar territory here. Randy Lopez, like all Anaya s protagonists, is on a spiritual quest. But both those new to and familiar with Anaya will recognize this philosophical meditation as part of a long literary tradition going back to Homer, Dante, and the Bible. Richly allusive and uniquely witty, Randy Lopez Goes Home presents man s quest for meaning in a touching, thought-provoking narrative that will resound with young adults and mature readers alike.
It seems like yesterday that I applied for the Graphic 45 DT hoping with everything crossed that I would make it to the next round - simply so I could do the best I could and post it to them to show them! I was so very proud of myself that I did make it to the next round and secretly hoped and hoped that I would see my name up there when the time came. I did try to talk myself out of it - looking at the list of names I was sure that was going to be as far as I made it. Off to Bali we went on a special family holiday to celebrate hubby's birthday... won't say how old hehe! And it was also my youngest daughters birthday too whilst over - on 2nd April....... Being on the other side of the world to the Graphic 45 headquarters means that I didn't get the news until the morning of Chionia's birthday - we had woken up in the hotel room - I had booted up the laptop and connected to the internet (which in Bali was slow rofl!) and watched while Chionia opened her present - Hubby asked if I knew and my reply was no - not sure if I did want to look - my eldest daughter then said well I will then to which I replied no I will and did and couldn't believe what I read - there was my name... and I sat there in stunned silence watching birthday girl playing with her toys and then getting ready for a day at Waterbom park all whilst thinking OMG I did it.....
You'll notice though, that while being an Avenger is something that Brian would clearly love to do, he does initially turn it down. You can see the disappointment on his face, but out of a sense that he might be letting people down - his team-mates, the people of Britain maybe. That's just how he is. Its a key point to his character. He's a very personable human being - something which was made pretty clear throughout Captain Britain and MI13. Despite his posh boy roots he remains a man of the people, and he's connected to them on a level few other National Superheroes could ever possibly know. Because that connection actually is a physical thing. It part and parcel of his very powers.
And if you just don’t want to be bothered with any of that, and you don’t mind using an external service, you could try using Bill Simon’s Google Voice-SIP gateway (the linked article shows how to use it with an Obihai device, but if you read through it you will see it also shows that the gateway can be used with Asterisk directly).
can be seen in his reflection
V. If We Fail to Act
I can only imagine what you can come up with using this pattern...
in left side picture,you can download from www.joyiphone.net.
b. Books
Keep, unless it was really rubbish, then it’s off to Oxfam. Never ever ever throw away, ever – it’d feel like throwing away a living thing. Ugh.
While I'd entered shows before, entering The Duchess was like walking into a gun fight armed with a Uzi. I knew she was a knock out, and wholecloth quilts generally do well because they don't have a lot to complete against.
‘Mummy, there is I took it out of my bottom and put it in there myself’. Ok, I was listening now, I let the water out and yes she was right, there was poo in there and I had been scrubbing the kitchen floor, with poo water!
blanket of clouds,
Ground Turkey/Apple/Carrot Meatballs (serves 4-6)
Walker is a residential suburb just east of the centre of Newcastle. Walker's name is a hybrid of Old English and Viking Norse, "Wall-kjerr", where "kjerr" is Norse for "marshy woodland". The name therefore means "marshy woodland by the wall", where the wall in question is of course Hadrian's Wall.
After changing her shoes I spotted another store across the street we could just walk to, so I picked her up, closed the hatchback, and had the immediate sensation that can only be described as "Oh Fuck." After a quick check of my pockets, I peered into the hatchback where I saw, partially hidden by the word Ross and a pair of my daughter's shoes, my car keys. Not too old to remember where they were this time.
Sweet clover is valued for its medicinal uses because the flower contains coumarinic acids. Coumarin is the active ingredient in prescription anticoagulants (blood-thinning medications).
The prime minister eulogized his father as a man who knew “how to identify danger in time” — a quality, his father told him, “that our people lost while in exile.” Benzion also taught him to “face reality head on” and “draw the necessary conclusions.”
8. The Kinks "Have a Cuppa Tea" 3:42
I then inserted head pins through center of Lucite flowers with silver balls and attached to 1/8 ribbon for attached page maker..
Dr Seuss' How the Grinch stole Christmas ... Cartoon Network (east) ... 7:30 PM
Thank God that He has made you holy by the blood of Jesus. Resolve to follow Him today, allowing Him to make you holy.
Alexander still stared when she stalked towards him, transfixed by the sky-blue of her eyes, noticing the knife in her hands only because its blade had the same dangerous glint. Even her dress was blue, although now stained with dark spots of water. And yet, he never hand seen something more beautiful. Never mind her angry glare, the threateningly raised weapon or her rather dishevelled and untidy state. Had Alexander been old enough, he would have known that he was about to fall in love.
Sentiment - Wild Rose Studio
“Jump in and catch your baby,” my doula said to Lloyd and without thought he splashed in, not even thinking to check if his iPhone was in his pocket (luckily not). He took up position behind me and bumped my leg, and I warned him off touching the baby. There was a bit of a pause, and then baby turned and I was pushing and out he came.
Also, I don't think I have another teacup with such a highly "footed" saucer. From this angle, you can see the styling a bit better. There are no markings so I have no idea of the age or maker, but for only $6 I knew this hoochie mama of a teacup needed to come home with me!
19 May 12 – West Ham or Cardiff v Birmingham v Blackpool @ Wembley
“Strains on families.
1 gotcha
So the policies that cause the destruction of the family - policies the left adores - lead to what little evidence there is for the income inequality they complain about. I have a better idea: stop trying to destroy the family.
May 2nd is the feast of St. Athanasius (ca. 296-298 – 2 May 373) The 20th bishop of Alexandria, he was at the center of one of the greatest controversies to face the church. He was exiled 5 times by Roman emperors because of his stance for orthodoxy and he is also the first person to list the 27 books which make up the canon of the New Testament.
Tonight’s series opener is at 7:05 at Cheney Stadium, and the weather is supposed to be nice. If you can’t make it to the park, tune in on 850 AM in and around Tacoma, or listen via the online stream. Tacoma starts RHP Jeff Marquez (1-0, 6.00) against Fresno LHP Brian Burres (0-1, 4.76).
Tomato Sauce, 1 tablespoon
I wouldn't want to turn the clock back. I'm grateful that there is legislation that protects people from discrimination and recognises that their personal circumstances should be accommodated, wherever possible. I'm glad that Miss Snellham can now expect compassionate leave if Hiss Havering's mother dies.
The only drawback is that your nails take quite a while to dry, even with the drying drops. This took me a while to get used to, having switched from Seche Vite which dries almost instantaneously. And also, the base coat bonds pretty strongly to your nail, so no picking at your polish! I made that mistake, and ended up with some peeling.
Carrots (chopped)
Obama calls the Iraq war “a botched and ill-advised U.S. military incursion into a Muslim country.” He is also protective of civil rights for Muslims in the U.S.
So, ultimately, my take on content mills is this: if you're going to write for them, do it. Build up an online portfolio, and move on. Use content mills as a stepping stone, and don't get stuck there forever. Like me, you might even want to keep a decent one in your back pocket to fill in the gaps between accounts once you build your business.
Apples are a great slow-digesting carbohydrates source with numerous beneficial antioxidants. This incredible fruit contains a compound that boost muscle strength, fat loss, and endurance, it’s called polyphenols. That is why apples are a great pre-workout food that will help you train longer and harder.
How could Paul expect God to bless this trip and his stay in Rome if he did it in the flesh? It had to be God’s work and it had to be God’s way. Otherwise he could not expect God to provide. Furthermore if the apostle had prayed for the Lord to work it all out and then went about to make his own plans it would grieve the Holy Spirit.
Now, I wish to sit here alone, fill my ears with pleasure, and sip my wine.
I made the tag by using the path feature in SCAL and then printing instead of cutting. I'm trying to teach myself to write on a path using MS Word or some other program but I haven't worked it out. This seems to be doing the job so far.
Next stop is the blacksmith’s. It’s time to sell-off some of these goodies I’ve been collecting. I meet Beirand the blacksmith, and I’m happy to report that he is a much better blacksmith than Rustleif. Of course the only criteria I am judging him by is whether he offers me any fetch quests. He doesn’t. And just like that, I don’t hate him.
If you want to go to Liverpool Beer Festival (16 - 18 February), you need to have your wits about you. There are postal applications with different rules for members of Liverpool Branch, members of other Branches and non-members, and there is the allocation for those who work the festival. Finally, there’s the famous queuing for tickets on a freezing December morning.
Meanwhile, cook the quinoa according to the package directions. Fold in the parsley, 2 teaspoons of the oil, ½ teaspoon salt, and ⅛ teaspoon pepper.
Still, forming a clear-cut opinion isn’t easy. Ratner is building subsidized housing in a city where there’s a cruel 3 percent vacancy rate.
After seeing this puzzling phenomenon, I asked my husband who grew up in the Central Valley, if he had ever seen plastic over the vines. He said no, which didn’t answer my questions. After a series of guesses, we concluded that the green plastic may be like those little green bags we all put our veggies inside to keep them from ripening too soon. Or, maybe, the plastic makes a mini-greenhouse and the grapes will mature faster.
Efforts have been made to place animals in as natural an environment as possible. Ultimately, however, the overriding feeling I have in any zoo is still one of exhibits of animals in confined spaces. Some argue that if conservation is the motive, money would be better spent in open wildlife sanctuaries and contributions made towards the animals' native environments in their home countries.
I stake my life on this claim. Why? Because Jesus staked His life on it! When He
So Day 2 consisted of the length of South Dakota. It's amazing how the scenery just gets so much better once you cross the state line. I adore this state so much!
Repeal these Islamic laws (sharia) and begin prosecuting the Muslims who are murdering Christians to the fullest extent of Western law. That or we should destroy their nuclear facilities and cut all aid (under the next President, because Hussein ain't going to do jack.)
You are Wonderful.
There are two types of Commitment: Commitment that is unconscious and manifested by your actions rather than what you verbally intend, and commitment that is consciously and deliberately planned for and chosen. The unconscious commitment is the one you may not be aware of but everyone else is by your actions around it.
Because this way of life—devouring, degrading, and insane—cannot continue. For “sustainable” to mean anything, we must embrace and then defend the bare truth: the planet is primary. The life–producing work of a million species are literally the earth, air, and water that we depend on. No human activity—not the vacuous, not the sublime—is worth more than that matrix. Neither, in the end, is any human life. If we use the word “sustainable” and don’t mean that, then we are liars of the worst sort: the kind who let atrocities happen while we stand by and do nothing.
Intriguing. Particularly since it’s not obvious to me that the naming convention makes sense. Why would it make less or no sense to name a destroyer after a president and an aircraft carrier after a state?
Rumours have appeared about a console, made by Valve. Nothings clear yet and all is just speculation, but some things are said to be true. For example, the specs of the console have been "revealed", having a Core i7 CPU, 8GB of RAM, and an NVIDIA GPU. This seems to be true, because an employee of Valve posted a tweet on the 2nd November last year, with a picture.
For the country in its turmoil
He went into the tunnel.
Now, twenty-five years later, Amanda and Dawson are summoned back to Oriental for the funeral of Tuck Hostetler, the mentor who once gave shelter to their high school romance. Neither has lived the life they imagined . . . and neither can forget the passionate first love that forever changed their lives. As Amanda and Dawson carry out the instructions Tuck left behind for them, they realize that everything they thought they knew -- about Tuck, about themselves, and about the dreams they held dear -- was not as it seemed. Forced to confront painful memories, the two former lovers will discover undeniable truths about the choices they have made. And in the course of a single, searing weekend, they will ask of the living, and the dead: Can love truly rewrite the past?
and now I'm finding it to be the same with my own children.
2.Deidra B
56. Brown Liquor -- John Anderson
gone into the stones of the building.)
I can't wait to get down and dirty with these babies in my kitchen! Ben has been eyeing them since I opened the package, and I keep expecting to walk into the kitchen and find him guiltily grating and zesting his heart out. I'm so glad I got these, and I know they will be used frequently. They are great quality, so I know they'll be around for a long long time. I would absolutely recommend these to anyone looking for a zester! The shape and size makes these so easy to use, plus it's super fun that some of them have color options for the handles! Who doesn't like to accessorize in their kitchen?! You can find them here at the CSN kitchen store!
Everything came together wonderfully. The cake was moist and full of flavor, very similar to banana bread, and the topping was sweet, crunchy and delicious. It was a bit thicker than the cookbook picture, but I blame myself and my extra liberalness with the nuts and coconut. My only piece of advice: ice cold milk is to this cake as fine wine is to a fancy steak dinner. It's a necessary complement. Or a cup of Joe, of course.
99 11. “American Aid and Greek Tyranny: A Memorandum Upon Being Expelled from Greece as a Foreign Correspondent.” Congressional Record, vol. 116, p. 42624; Daily Record, p. E10520 (December 18, 1970); also, Greek Report, London, England, September-December 1970, p. 8.
To match, a pair of bootees using the Saartje's Bootees pattern, also free on Ravelry and the third time I've made them. The straps seem a little fiddly but are actually quite straightforward to make, and hopefully should be relatively secure. You may note my use of a neutral colour (it's a lovely soft merino wool) with the blue buttons, added when I found out the baby's gender. Clever, huh?
And apparently, most of my posts have a disclaimer of some kind, lol.
Best bloated civil service
What was your inspiration for becoming a teacher?
Next, take steps to help keep honest people honest. Use sign-in/sign-out sheets to track who’s been in the server room. (You do have a server room with a locked door, right? If not, re-read Law #3). Implement a “two person” rule when installing or upgrading software. Diversify management tasks as much as possible, as a way of minimizing how much power any one administrator has. Also, don’t use the Administrator account—instead, give each administrator a separate account with administrative privileges, so you can tell who’s doing what. Finally, consider taking steps to make it more difficult for a rogue administrator to cover his tracks. For instance, store audit data on write-only media, or house System A’s audit data on System B, and make sure that the two systems have different administrators. The more accountable your administrators are, the less likely you are to have problems.
On Bride’s Eve in the Islands young girls made a female figure from a sheaf of corn, kept in reverence from the previous year’s harvest. They decorated it with colored shells and sparkling crystals, together with snowdrops and primroses and other early spring flowers and greenery. An especially bright shell, symbol of emerging life, or a crystal was placed over its heart, and called ‘Bride’s guiding star’. They dressed themselves in their own finery and carried their effigy through the village on Bride’s Feast Day to invoke the light.
This is an odd one. Good appearance and body, but hollow despite the initial jolt from the hops. I think it's mitigated by the adjuncts, and so it makes me think that this is what an overly hopped Budweiser would taste like.
If you want to download it, you can find P*Tag on Amazon for only $2.99 (and no, you don't have to own a Kindle. You can download the software for Kindle Books right on to your computer, free and easy as pie):
12. Fantasy (Christiansen, v. d. Knaap, Buschman) 3:45
Secondly, they don’t know exactly why the methods seem to work. None of the researchers have medical expertise on autism.
2. I’ve been kissed (on the cheek) by Michael Damien.
Mirrors lie to me
3. Lilly Pulitzer “Kelley” Dress Off to the races in seersucker with tiny horse shoe accents. Lilly does it yet again and we love her for it!
Williams explained that by ridding the area of the cats that had been spayed or neutered, new stray or feral cats would move in and inhabit the same area.
“Religion is the root of all the mess in this world and the most racist, sexist , discriminatory vice of the society and the viral root cause of all evil in this world. Society will rot if this doesn’t end. Religion is a refuge ground for all the unscrupulous people, politicians,business men with number do ka paisa, criminals and many such others. I don’t think I need their company. It is a tool for gender inequality mainly oppression of women. I am perplexed at how even eman­ci­pated women pre­fer to stay within their reli­gious faiths and strug­gle against oppres­sion, and not choos­ing to dis­card religion? Glad you discarded it long back. ” He heaved a sigh of relief.
Flashbacks, used too often, give the reader the feel of being trapped with a sixteen-year-old learning to drive a stick-shift. Just get going forward, then the car (story) dies and rolls backward.
I feel a bit like a "debbie downer" with the end of this post, but that's how my May went! I'm making a smallish dent in my list, learning new things about myself, and trying to improve on my faults!
I thought perhaps a piano.
Continuing a theme of my time at home, somewhat, you can wish Sherpa a very Happy 2nd Birthday! She's marginally less silly than when she as a little kitten, and falls off things less, but it would still be a stretch to call her intelligent. She is, however, very active - being athletic and stupid, she doesn't fit in particularly with the family Thomas... but we love her to bits. I can't find her at the mo (she loves hiding) so here's an old picture.
“Plus her voice isn”t weird and scary, and doesn’t remind me of bad dreams about a robot that I had when I was ten, which made me wet the bed for two years.”
After we finish up I gather all the information up and stalk towards to lift. And promotly fall over into it. Jamie immediate dashes in with a concerned "Are you okay Katie?" and helps me up.
Social media case studies are incredibly valuable IF you can learn how and why social media worked in that particular instance, and apply that lesson to your own efforts. Otherwise you'll always be chasing the 'next big thing', and never quite catch it.
Preheat the oven to 400*F. Butter a baking sheet and lay as many slices down as possible without any touching. Place a spring of dill or another herb leaf down per slice, then top with another potato slice and press gently to ensure no air is in the center. Top with parchment paper, a second baking sheet, and a heavy pan. Cook for 20 min until lightly brown and crispy.
What is mysticism? How is it different to spirituality? And why is mysticism important at this moment in time?
Once the cookie cutter was ready (it took him about 5 minutes to make this one!), I made my favorite sugar cookie recipe from "Pretty Party Cakes" and cut out my Superman logo cookies. After the cookies had baked and cooled, I piped the Superman logo detail in black royal icing, and the filled it in with red and yellow royal icing.
Thank you again for all your love and support
aside swiftly
I could easily see this being required reading for a Philosophy 101 course because of the simplistic style of writing and the sheer depth of Vandenburg’s arguments about the mind. This book is meant to stimulate thought and it does, whether you’ve come to his same conclusions already or not.
A sweet piece indeed!
The weather got cool earlier in the week and reminded me that winter was on its way. My one happiness regarding this season is the fact that I can start wearing my hoodies again because they’re my favourite clothes. I am super grateful for the comfort and warmth they provide over the chilly months.
So when this dream hit… I was shocked. Flabbergasted. Honestly!!! My love life has become so bland that I don’t even have fantasy material?!? What about Brad Pitt in Thelma & Louise?
I swirl.
Scratchin’ an’ scrabblin’ wif vishus claws,
Being somewhat more familiar with the treacherous slippery clay I went on ahead, still in silence and firmly grasping my lump of flint. Whilst memories of founding Fathers (and Mothers) had dominated much of the day, on this particular climb it was memories of future torch bearers which stole my attention, those ancestors who are yet to be, who will one day also walk this perilous and crooked path to further Roy’s work and his legacy.
In the 38 degree pouring rain/sleet.
Sombreros and Nacho Libre costumes are optional but highly encouraged…hope to see you all there as we wish Mike a safe journey and a quick return!
The Philippines will become the very first Asian Country to implement Rotavirus Vaccination in the EPI. Some of the countries that have Rotavirus Vaccine in the EPI include Australia, Austria, Brazil, Belgium, Ecuador, El Salvador, Finland, Germany, Mexico, Peru, South Africa, Bolivia, and Honduras.
By avoiding these common gestures associated with lying, we may learn to effectively lie. Keep in mind that these gestures, in and of themselves, do not indicate a liar. However, imagine a person who is rubbing their hands nervously, sitting back in a chair with locked ankles, maintaining very poor eye contact, and when you ask them a question, they lean further back and cover their mouth with their hand when they reply. This does not communicate an honest person. Sitting upright and slightly leaning forward with open hands resting on the table (fingers pointing out), shows a confident body and hand position. Paired with a good lie, this person becomes an effective liar.
4. Hip-Hop (Unreleased)
A French physicist named Lydéric Bocquet has published a mathematical description of stone-skipping1 (amongst other serious publications, he has also published a paper on cooking potato wedges and soon another one of his papers on ironing and the anatomy of wrinkles will be appearing in Soft Matter—needless to say I like this guy!). He calculates that the lift experienced by the stone is proportional to the square of the stone’s velocity. In other words, the faster the stone travels, the greater the lift. By playing around with maths, he came up with an expression that gave a critical velocity (i.e. a “speed limit”) for the stone. If the stone travelled at a velocity lower than this critical velocity, it would sink. In fact, the physics here is similar to that experienced by a water-skater. If a skater is travelling very slowly, he or she obviously can’t skate on the water and would sink.
When it was private interview time I was feeling some small nerves, sitting in the room with the other ladies and hearing them get called one by one really didn't help calm me either. Since I was from Wilber I was of course picked to go almost last for the private interviews. It's kind of hard to prepare for this one as they usually ask you off the wall questions. I can remember I was asked why I wanted to be the state queen and also what I would like to see started up as a new Czech program that would involve more youth. I think the most nervous part for me was when they asked me about some famous Czech Homolka guy, obviously I had no clue who they were talking about but I smiled and made it up.
“To approach the attainment of this highest level of development, the person should be able to live permanently in the subtlety of the Primordial Consciousness.
Now just because it’s a Prothean and its Day 1 DLC people are yelling and complaining that the game is now ‘no longer complete.’ And that the From Ashes DLC should be included day one on the disk. It appears people feel entitled to this content based on the early game script leaks that – without spoiling to much – included a Prothean character in the story.
It seems like hoards of mini rap supremas were hiding hungrily in Nicki Minaj’s wig closet – just waiting for her to depart to the dreaded abyss of Mainstream. The minute Minaj shook hands with the techno devil (David Guetta) her potential successors sprung out of the woodworks and thus began the battle for the crown of Rap Princess – the prime contenders being the likes of Iggy Azalea, Kreayshawn and Azealia Banks. The objects of my undying affection. Honestly, that wasn’t sarcasm.
What exactly is time? Is it just the ticking of one second into the next combined into groups to make a minute which marches on into hours, days, and weeks? Or is it something more fluid? Is time an investment which gives us moments to make a lasting change which will, in a sense, stop time?
I feel I should warn my more conservative readers (as if we're pretending that I'm not a conservative reader myself) about the F-bombs littered throughout the text and the occasional sex scene. Neither were graphic, however, and neither took away from my enjoyment or concluding opinion that after 11/22/63, you'd be hard pressed to find a person who doesn't like at least one novel by Stephen King.
And to the prestigious Gold Brewgie Nominations;
Pepper Spray Boogie by The Compulsive Gamblers
Hooray for Mr. D for finding the "roundtoit"!
Issued to: Rangers FC
I print the photos on prepared fabric purchased through ebay. I have not found very much difference between manufactures products. I have printed on organza, cotton and silk. The secret to the ink not running is to have a printer that uses ultrabrite inks. I have a Epson workforce 520 all in one. The results are consistent and I have not had any problems. I let my prints sit for 48 hours before removing them from the paper backing and pressing with an iron to set the ink.
Looks like the Soviet Cold War Era all over again, except this time the world isn’t going to allow any colonialism or proxy wars anymore, with Human Rights secure nations immune in any case. The Middle East looks like the last frontier and even then, those regions are increasingly peopled by eduicated people who will not tolerate any foreign incursions anymore. Palestine issue is the worst sideshow of course . . . such a small region of the world will not hold hostage 192 countries.
Hugs, Love and a "Bright"Bus on the Cheek!
So Bastian Schweinsteiger approached the spot. A goal would put Bayern through to the final. He made no mistake and converted the crucial spot-kick. Bayern won the shootout 3-1.
The Columbia River Crossing, as it is known, is outdated and slated to be replaced. Still, it is beautiful. We were fortunate enough to be there for the sirens to sound before the raising of a section of the bridge making way for a ship to pass through.
Next on the Hop is:
This one is my favorite.
I was planning on DIY-ing a headboard, but then I got this guy as a Christmas present!
Poke`mon Adjustment Fair Nintendo DS
I had recently realized I wanted to leave business and management consulting behind, and had begun creative writing again and other creative activities.
Keri: What are you doing here?
2-3 tablespoons chopped fresh parsely
Today, I took another class at Sur La Table. It was an “Italian Bread Workshop.” I LOVED it! I’ve made my own pizza dough, focaccia and other hand shape artisan breads for years. But today, I learned so much and I think and hope it will vastly improve what I was doing.
Napster does off deep discounts if pay by the year, which brings down the monthly cost to $4.17 for computers and $8.00 a month for computers and 1 mobile. I think a fairer pricing would be per login, no matter which device you used. Since I seldom listen on my iPod touch, I’m actually over-paying for Rhapsody, so I’m thinking of stepping down to a $4.99 plan at another service – except that the next consideration is number of songs in the library.
Please feel free to leave any additional good sources in the comments. Meanwhile, I offer my solidarity to the stateless Bidoons of Kuwait, and hope that the government and the Kuwaiti people will see the light before anyone else has to get hurt.
As lawgiver, He is all good.
I had some plain wooden craft blocks left from another project and decided to try something fun. I have been trying to come up with creative ways to teach my son to write. We are having lots of giggles with these.
step 3: sew!
Enlightenment and well-being
or full of argument.
Unaware you’d leave so soon, we should spend the years ahead more wisely.
49. You always tell me that you want to leave roughly 15-20 minutes before you actually want to leave. I don’t know why I still fall for it. Probably because you’re so cute.
After I wrote my first novel back in 2008 I had no idea how to take criticism – constructive or otherwise. I felt the need to constantly defend everything and take “the meanies” on. Not until I realized that people (namely other writers) online don’t know me, which means they’re not criticizing me…they’re criticizing my writing. BIG difference. Once I took my “but my writing is so good” jacket off and slathered up with a thick layer of “I can take this because it’ll make me a better writer” I saw through even the snarkiest comments and got something out of them.
Err, ok…where?…and when?
Judith x
in b’riyah….the world of thought/creation the rabbis ethan and joel coen didn’t just pull “the dude abides” out of thin air, you know. consider Psalm 102:26ff), which describes how the earth and the heavens are G’d's handiwork….”even all this will perish, but you will endure”. haDude abides. meditate on what this means for how you divide your intellectual time….are overinvested in that which will perish?
A Star Trek theme from Goldsmith that’s always in the shadow of his music for Star Trek: The Motion Picture but this is, in some ways, just as good as the title theme for the movie. Grand and epic it soars on the small screen. I’ve always thought though that the edit in the middle of this (original) version could have been done better.
Source: AMNRL
5) Cyclamen Pink
It serves an estimated population of over 639,000, approximately 21% of the total Welsh population?
Though I do not know her exact numbers, I can give a fairly accurate "guesstimate".
In the end, I was smiling, but I also felt bereft. It’s as if I invited Tyler over for a substantive meal, and she just dropped by for tea and sympathy.
I can remember seeing her stand in the kitchen, hands on hips, paused between steps, thinking, as she moved from the stove to the refrigerator and back. Her cooking was instinctive more than trained. But she knew she wasn’t an innovator. She stuck to the meals she knew best – hearty, simple, typically Southern-style dishes that would stick to your ribs and make tasty leftovers. (Fried potato cakes made for breakfast from leftover mashed potatoes were my favorite.)
When I got off the pills-- after a "detox" of about two months where all my hormone systems were scarily out of whack-- it felt like I had woken up. My head felt clearer. My emotional highs and lows were more tolerable. I felt good. A couple of months after that I was pregnant.
Here’s the truth about flouride. When bauxite is turned into aluminum, a highly toxic waste product is formed — flouride. After being fined repeatedly for dumping this waste into lakes and rivers, the aluminum industry publicized several obscure, inconclusive tests showing that flouride is good for the teeth. So now, instead of being fined, the aluminum companies are being paid to dump their waste product into municipal waters. This would be fine except for one minor detail. After the formative years, flouride conferes no benefits. In fact, it is implicated in heart disease and cancer.
I adore this never-ending freakshow of a city. It's a place that taught me to be comfortable and confident with who I am. I love moving between its various scenes, from hipsters to hippies to house kids to old school punk rockers, political activists, futurists, artists, scientists, students, burners, bohemians, surfers, cyclists, and tech-addled transplants who dream of changing the world. (Or at least: making a lot of money.) I love its Victorian charm, the grit of its industrial zones, the beauty of its Bay and ocean. The hills and the way the fog comes tumbling across the sides of Sutro, gliding across the valleys into the heart of the city.
The memory that he chose the life;
The current issue of the British Medical Journal cites five fears that can officially be crossed off the holiday worry list.
Me: What is the weather gonna be like tomorrow?
Reading: But during the night, the angel of the Lord opened the doors of the prison, led them out, and said,“Go and take your place in the temple area, and tell the people everything about this life.” (Acts 5:19-20)
One thing is the reactions against his poem. That is fine and well, I sincerely do believe that his poem and thoughts should be reacted to. Another thing is the demand to censure him or – as is the case now here in Israel, after Eli Yishai’s rather childish reaction – to prohibit him to enter.
That is always
Whenever I'm back home, I borrow tons of books and movies from the library and read them all night, every night - sleeping at dawn and waking past noon. Not the best habit, but I'm pretty comfortable with being somewhat nocturnal. So far, I've finished my little sister's favorite series, the Twilight books (which were surprisingly quite good), some foreign films like Volver and La Vie en Rose (with a brilliant Marion Cotilliard), and am moving onto the classics, including Funny Face (with Audrey Hepburn).
Thursday 29th March will be known as the ''Bradford Spring'' according to George ''the traitor'' Galloway, Galloway won an unprecedented so called victory over the Labour Party who incidentally have controlled this seat in Bradford West for over four decades, his landslide ''victory'' was the culmination of the Muslim vote, a staggering 18,341 votes, that's 56% of the actual turnout. Bradford is now a predominately a Muslim enclave, there is no wonder he got that many votes. George Galloway has in the past been a very colourful figure in British politics, he was booted out of the Labour Party in 2003 for what can only be called as his stance against Tony Blair and his stance on the war in Iraq and Afghanistan, Galloway went to Iraq and had a meeting with the then leader of Iraq Saddam Hussain, he also held rallies for ''free Palestine''. No less than 12 hours after Galloway was declared the winner, a lone Indigenous young man stood his ground and made his point and hurled eggs at Galloway and the office he was residing, whilst he was hurling these eggs, Galloway's supporters (Muslims) surrounded the young man and tried to forcefully move him away.
moment of tenderness
We’ve tried a few methods in our house to wash eggs but the one we like best is as follows:
The taste like sweet summer.
2. Are you still dealing with strong feelings of anger, rage, loss, anxiety, depression etc.?
Like slaves rowing to a distant land
I contacted WP twice, hoping for a speedy recovery. I didn’t want to move my blog or start from scratch; I’ve spent a lot of time developing this one. Fortunately, the powers that be felt my repentance, reviewed my blog, and reactivated it. It was shut down because it was flagged in an anti-spam check. While everything was dealt with promptly, I, and I’m sure all of you, would appreciate it if they reviewed the blogs flagged prior to deactivating them. It may have been routine on their end, but it caused a mini-heart attack on this end.
with the slightest promise of rain
Genre: Poetry
Food and cooking have always interested me, not in just the practical details but the anthropology of the kitchen.Food from all over the world,the sharing of food and the rich traditions connected with it.I was first entranced when I found European Peasant Cookery by Elizabeth Luard and I can thank her for intriguing me She introduced me to the staple food of Europe and many variations on a theme.
So the problem with America my friends, aside from our new impatience with any administration or any policy that takes more than six months to register a measurable improvement is this infantile desire to be lied to in place of an ugly truth, and the willingness to trade our safety and our future for just the right fantasy. Too many of us will buy into any lie, as long as the reality it promises let’s us get away with something. You can’t discuss policy with people who want to be lied to. You can’t have a conversation with someone who is lying about how they really feel, unless your goal is to waste your time. I don’t argue with Tea Baggers.
The administration downplays these findings. But the students who attend D.C. public schools are overwhelmingly black and poor, and the achievement gap has a particularly devastating impact on their communities. High school dropouts are eight times more likely than someone with a diploma to wind up behind bars. Some 60% of black male high school dropouts in their 30s have prison records. And nearly one in four young black male dropouts is in jail or juvenile detention.
For this landscape, for these amazing children that I share living space with, for their friends, for the village and its inhabitants, for the mountains, for the food, for the sunshine, for the warmth, for the life, for the unfolding of the journey.
1. Groovin’
Why worry about this trend? Because, Sandel argues, market values are crowding out civic practices. When public schools are plastered with commercial advertising, they teach students to be consumers rather than citizens. When we outsource war to private military contractors, and when we have separate, shorter lines for airport security for those who can afford them, the result is that the affluent and those of modest means live increasingly separate lives, and the class-mixing institutions and public spaces that forge a sense of common experience and shared citizenship get eroded.
I hope you enjoyed the photos.
Voice Very high-pitched. Call: a soft, sibilant seee, usually buzzier and bending in american wildlife, tseeesee. Flight call: a short, vulnerable tsf; reduced and smoother than golden-crowned kinglet and chickadees. Song: diverse, but involves several paperwork, seee seeedsee sideeu. Eastern audio more complicated, quavering, and usually end on a higher note; american audio more stroking and often end on a low please take be aware.
Favorite Quote: It's so stupid, but you can't buy fireworks in Oregon, or even have them in your possession. At least, nothing that's any good. Nothing that goes more than six feet along the ground or twelve inches into the air. Which pretty much leaves those black tablets that grow into ash snakes after you light them. Oh, and sparklers. Lame-O.
Me: You pulled this cover off and you peed down this hole?
I raced it some, as I kicked it to life.
The yawn-inducing record opens with the closest thing to a real beat you’ll find for the next half-hour on “Alphabet Song”, which will probably have you lulled into a false sense of security, thinking, “Hey, maybe this album won’t be half bad after all.” And for the record, I’ll admit that the first minute and 12 seconds of Nootropics are tolerable. But as soon as Hunter steps onto the scene with that boyish narcotic moan, I sighed inwardly, resigning myself to the fact that in the world of indie rock, there are some bands that just need to stop. Please. Stop making music. I’m begging you here.
Kari: Dude. Does your new novel idea have cameos from this book in it????
But don't you ever bet me
No more, tho. I'm taking time to choose each moment, to either stop what I was doing and be fully present to do the next thing, or to ask for a moment to wrap things up so I can do the next thing. More changes are coming, I know. For today, tho - this moment - it's enough to claim my right to do one thing at a time, to rest once in a while, to have a clean, non-cluttered place in my head and in my soul, and yes in my house -- to just BE.
This took nearly two hours. It was past Xander's bed time.
Genre : Fantasy/Romance
For more information see the National Autistic Society website or ring the helpline on 0808 800 4104.
Writing - It is the air I breathe. I listen to Life (Inhale) and I breathe and write (exhale). Selasie Bulmuo - Social Worker, Writer/ Author, Counsellor/Pastor Selasie heads SJB Resource Ltd, a Social Capital Builder, working with individuals & groups including families, in the area of social work assessments and support services, confidence building, workshops and training, counselling and sign posting to other agencies and services. Selasie runs SJB Resource with a team of volunteers and paid contracted professionals who are experts in the fields of the Arts, Counselling, and Social Work among others. Selasie is a mother of three and believes that she is a VOICE by calling mainly to families. She is a Author and Conference and workshop Resource Person. She enjoys sharing her love of writing with others as a therapeutic and reflective tool for rebuilding one’s life. She also supports her husband in Pastoring a thriving church, Fountain Gate Chapel in Seven Sisters, London. Selasie says:
The song “Friends” from Elton John is the link below:
And for those of you who are thinking, ‘Who is this Sparky she refers to?’. Nicholas Sparks writer of the books that these fantabulous movies were based on…
I used to be the crazy mom…well not crazy like reality TV crazy, but crazy in the sense that I used to call my son’s preschool teacher every day until he was fully transitioned. It’s heartbreaking to leave your kid for the first time, so as a mom there I was delaying my departure and arriving earlier than usual for pickup and calling the teacher everyday just to see how long it was before he stopped crying. Enfadosa, my mom would say.
This is a closer look. You can spot that the wrappers came flour-dusted to preserve the smoothness of the wrappers when the Wantons finally boiled. In addition it also prevented the wrappers sticking to each other in the pack.
"Dirty Angel" - 3:36
See, when Keri tells our son the plan she doesn’t give him all the details in the plan, she simply gives him a general overview of the plan so that he knows just enough to have something to look forward to. She gives him this overview not because she doesn’t know the details, but because it would take a little too much time and energy at the end of the day when her knees are about to buckle. In reality, however, our son doesn’t need to to know the details of the plan, all he needs to know are the characteristics of the one making the plan. He needs to know that his mommy loves him, that she’s trustworthy, and that her plans for him are made for his best. If he knows these things, then he can still sleep soundly at night, even if he doesn’t know everything he wants to know about the plan.
An audience of approximately 750 also heard an opening set by Susanna Wallumrod. She and her two-piece band sounded like Tori Amos on a Terje Rypdal jag. This cover of Thin Lizzy's "Jailbreak" wasn't on the set list, but it captures her sensibility. Wallumrod's music isn't my thing (at all), but I fully embrace the concept of jazz acts being featured on compatible cross-genre double bills.
“Few people would argue against making environmental review processes and regulations more efficient—as long as they’re effective. But changes announced in the recent federal budget don’t do that. Instead, they make it easier for the federal government and industry to push through projects that could harm the environment and the economy, and limit the ability of ordinary Canadian citizens to have a say in matters of national importance. Based on the budget announcement, you’d think delays and duplication in the environmental review process are the biggest issues. They’re not. As the Pembina Institute points out, the equivalent of one major oil sands mine has been approved in each of the past five years, and the pace is increasing. Some people, including former Alberta premier Peter Lougheed, suggest we’d benefit by slowing down—for economic and environmental reasons. When there are setbacks in the review process, they’re often caused by industry’s reluctance to provide timely data or by a lack of capacity within the government itself. The latter is getting worse as funding for basic monitoring and enforcement is subject to further cuts. Eliminating environmental reviews for some projects altogether, shifting responsibility to the provinces, and severely cutting back on staff and agencies that provide management and information are not ways to make processes more efficient; they’re ways to accelerate approval of major projects, making the short-term interests of industry a higher priority than protecting the air, land, and water we all need to stay healthy. …
No shit, today I sprained my left ankle, sprained my right foot, strained my right wrist, hurt my pelvis, and made mincemeat out of both feet and my right hand. And my poor phone.
I must say I was not too happy with the photos I took on her birthday. And, this frustrated me. I have just been really off with photography lately, and I'm not sure why. Maybe my frustrations at not having a working computer to upload photos to, or not being able to go where I want to go with photography. Maybe it's not having the energy to and time to put what I need to into my photography. And the two times I tried to get photos with the pumpkin, she was chasing her cousin around, and I couldn't get her to sit still with me. She had a great birthday though, and I can finally get some sleep now hopefully. Except, I do have to move on to the Nursery now that I am finished with the hubs birthday and her big 2nd Birthday celebration.
We stop at the terminal and I impatiently unclick my seatbelt long before the light goes off. I feel annoyed at the fellow passengers thwarting my desire for a hasty exit to the terminal and my beloved LA beyond. I try to maintain my manners as I make a place for myself in the now-crowded aisle and retrieve my carry-on from the overhead lockers and then stand in the confined space trying not to inhale through my nose the assault of the aroma of too many economy class passengers who have stewed in their own juices for the past 20 hours or so from Sydney. Finally the door is opened and the line of humanity begins to flow out the bottle-neck onto the air bridge. Air bridge. Stairs. More stairs. A passageway. Travelator. Ramp. Passageway. Immigration. I head straight for the bathrooms and relish in the space after the confinement of the ones on the plane that have grown ever grottier on the hours of our journey. The bathrooms here are huge and basic and old. But even here I begin to smile at little things that tell me I'm "home" - starting with paper toilet seat covers which are a rarity in Australia. Damn, I love those things! I wash my hands for a long time and behold my economy-class ravaged face and hair. I try to freshen up, brush my teeth, drag a brush through hair traumatised by pressurisation and condensed human breath. I smile at myself and try not to giggle or cry. I'm home!
Her great talent gives me hope because I too was born without fingers on my right hand. I had grown up assuming most two handed instruments were off limits because of my ‘disability.’ I played the trumpet for a short while in elementary, less than enjoying being the only girl in a group of boys who mostly liked to blow spit from their instruments. Soon after, I quit it so I could have more time playing on the various sport teams. Basketball, softball, volleyball, they never proved an issue for this one handed wonder. I excelled in each all through grade school by the grace of God and my father’s athletic genes. But music? Music would be the unattainable world that I longed from a distance to explore. I can chuckle at the thought, but it has honestly taken almost all my 26 years to grasp the hope this one video has given me.
paint den
This is my second week of living out of a hotel while doing a training course. Business class transience, all expenses paid. I'm not complaining, though I'm looking forward to reconnecting with my usual surroundings. Am I simply starting to feel rootless? That's plausible, given that hotels -- especially corporate name brand hotels -- are a paradoxical monoculture unto themselves: they are everywhere and nowhere at the same time. When I look out the window, am I seeing the 401 in sort-of-Toronto, or Interstate 15 in Idaho Falls? The landscape offers no clues (dead grass, parking lots, the usual big box stores, a few ribbons of highway), and neither does the room itself.
Get ready to fall in love with vegetables.
so this year I made a handful of Christmas cards and while I didn't send out as many as I'd hoped - It's at least at start. Don't take offense if you didn't get one from me - another part of my resolution is to start collecting people's addresses - so if you'd like a card from me - just email me your address.
Pour batter into the prepared pan and bake for 30-40 mins (mini loaf pans), 45-50 minutes 8 inch round cake or until a toothpick, inserted in the center, comes out clean.
March Play Group classes are just around the corner. I'd LOVE to have you come to one of them, host one in your home with your friends, or even participate long distance. I'm confident you would enjoy what we do and be happy with the projects you make! Keep reading...
- Toshinari K.
A very memorable experience indeed.
finish the dance
5. Chained (Ballard) 5:18
I love anything stuffed inside a carbohydrate shell. It may not be good for me, but it certainly is delicious. My husband taught me how to make awesome cabbage burgers. I always loved growing up in Cleveland surrounded delicious Polish food like pierogies. I am always surprised how few people know what these delectable pockets of goodness entail! Last year, Sam and I even used our homemade pasta maker to make our very own pierogies...delicoius! However, all of these tasty treats will have to wait until a later post. Today I will focus on a new-found love- kolaches!
She had another one Sunday night,
AMuse No heatsetting, dries quickly, nice rich black
Today it doesn't matter that my hair is getting frizzier and frizzier (and bigger and bigger) the further north we go. I can gel it all back in a big boofy bun and stick a flower in it to truly get into a resort frame of mind.
Yesterday, I went to Land’s End. With the weather the way it was, it was a bit like Scott’s last expedition to Antarctica. In the inevitable souvenir shop, they were selling Cornish flags and beer mats which were half Union flag and half Cornish flag (it is like the St George’s flag of England, but a white cross on a black background and has a piratical feel).
Bookstores are feeling the effects of iPads, Nooks and Kindles. And so are writers.
1. Fewer calories – but adjusting for more when I work out
¼ cup diced scallions
Really, that’s the bottom line: Who does this? Who chooses this level of scrutiny, trusts ratings-obsessed-producers to weave an accurate yarn, assumes that a relationship forged through competition can end up translating to happily ever after? Not me. I’ve had enough crazy in my life, thank you very much.
The diverse yet precise arrangements on the record certainly wet the mouths of industry professionals and common music fans alike; and his talent most certainly does not go unappreciated in his beautiful homeland, as he closed the Arts Festival of Reykjavik that occurred in June, with the help of the Icelandic symphony orchestra and singer Keren Ann. His new album hit the French Itunes top 10 upon release.
Every once in awhile you just have to take a break from the mundane and boring…ie:unpacking. All of the kids have been such a big help in the whole unpacking and organizing process. Probably because they know if they didn’t chip in they knew I would just start chucking their stuff as well as my own.
And of course Edward. A Quasimodo who is shown the beauty and power of love who is able to dedicate his whole life to giving the woman he loves something she enjoyed.
ID
They are certainly that, and I love it!
you twist me around
Since my last blog post, mobile apps have taken center stage in the world of interactivity. But I'll spare you a post about apps to focus on a campaign I came across this morning on YouTube: "My Movie Pitch" sponsored by American Express & Tribeca Film.
Step 6: Pin both sections in place. Use hairspray when needed.
They have also been denied any meaningful review of the reasons for their isolation.
SURPRISE
I would really like to touch base with a manager on this policy. It seems completely contrary to the Trump reputation and everything it stands for. However, I was unable to find Manager information (in addition to the "Gathering Policy") published on your website.
"It is with Origen that devotion to the letter of Scripture and concern to refer to the original text come to take on a new importance. Science will gain from this. But the living relationship between Scripture and tradition is on the way to being compromised." (Danielou, Couratin and Kent, 54)
As a matter of fact, I have I found that I can’t generally win any argument with my children. I was under the impression that, as the parent, I was meant to be the bigger, stronger, smarter, wittier person, but my children tell me otherwise.
Tabata Row
Preheat oven to 300 F.
The intra-Western, Atlantic ties between Europe and North America will still be the most important and defining global axis. Although not impossible, this is probably not the most likely alternative at this point, given the economic and cultural weakness of Europe in particular.
Frank is a young guy, maybe thirty, tall and thin, vaguely Russian, but not the pale Caucasian Russian; something darker and hardier. He’s expanded the place, put in nice wood flooring, a glass-fronted case with plants in pots on top and containing some random Salon supplies that no one ever looks at, a rack of old magazines, a refurbished Ms. Pac-Man game, and some extra chairs.
3/4 cup heath bar toffee bits
A romantic sci-fi thriller about love and second chances. Camden Pike has been grief-stricken since his girlfriend, Viv, died. Viv was the last good thing in his life: helping him rebuild his identity after a career-ending football injury, picking up the pieces when his home life shattered, and healing his pain long after the meds wore off. And now, he’d give anything for one more glimpse of her. But when Cam makes a visit to the site of Viv’s deadly car accident, he sees some kind of apparition. And it isn’t Viv. The apparition’s name is Nina, and she’s not a ghost. She’s a girl from a parallel world, and in this world, Viv is still alive. Cam can’t believe his wildest dreams have come true. All he can focus on is getting his girlfriend back, no matter the cost. But things are different in this other world: Viv and Cam have both made very different choices, things between them have changed in unexpected ways, and Viv isn’t the same girl he remembers. Nina is keeping some dangerous secrets, too, and the window between the worlds is shrinking every day. As Cam comes to terms with who this Viv has become and the part Nina played in his parallel story, he’s forced to choose—stay with Viv or let her go—before the window closes between them once and for all.
They were served with a dipping sauce that was a mix of "Just Like Honey" and yellow mustard.
Quests are completed simply by having the appropriate combination of resources on hand, at which point the player flips over the completed quest card and takes any rewards printed on it. Quests are divided into several different categories, and at the start of the game each player receives a secret card telling them which categories of completed quests will score them bonus points at the end of the game.
The idiot let loose with a rapid fury of strikes and blows from the photograph, pulverizing the sheets near the foot of the bed.
Before we move on lets look at a complete input tag, checkbox type:
Moab.
First course commenced
I mean, even the blueish hue to the scenes is blatantly lifted from Mann's movie. Except that in Heat, it fit the minimalist, loner characterization of De Niro's role and the bleak portrayal of a decadent Los Angeles, while the guys in Takers hit up a nightclub after their heist and hook up with chicks, smoke cigars and sip scotch like a scene out of Jersey Shore. The only thing missing was for DJ Pauly D to make a cameo appearance and start bumping some beats. All flash and absolutely no dash.
YOU mean you leave them out in the sun, and they get all brown and sprout little white hairs?...nope…
Fucker, and D.O.C. are all good newish DC hardcore bands. There was a
I screamed.
So my hair is now manageable again and with a sprinkling of silver. It was getting a bit wayward as it had not been cut since mid-November last year. I feel so much better, a little glamorous, just need a bit of ‘slap’, to complete the picture.
it is so hard
Rev. James Moody, President, Manna House Ministries, Jamestown, Tennessee
Darwin and Wedgwood (as well as their family and friends) left so much written documentation behind (books, journals, letters, notes) that Heiligman never guesses to thought process or motivation, footnoting the source for each he/she said/thought.
…to love all of you bunches!! Xoxo!
Chomp and Shop
Happy Wednesday!
12And the sixth angel poured out his vial upon the great river Euphrates; and the water thereof was dried up, that the way of the kings of the east might be prepared.
Though lads are lads within womb’s earliest,
6. I want a little piggy more than anything. They are some of the smartest creatures alive, ranking just below primates and whales and such, they are incredibly clean and hypoallergenic, and can be taught to use a litter box. The ones that are bred to be pets are so soft, and social and cute. The only thing I don’t love about these little guys is their price…I can’t help but think of all the wonderful things I could buy for $1,000. Including my rent.
I don’t know if it’s my low expectations or the fact that I was craving a romantic story I knew wouldn’t come crashing down when the writers stopped taking their pills (GG, I’m looking at you). Or is it because it has some elements of Coming To America (which I love) and Kate & Leopold (which is cute)? Or that there are enough hot guys in it that every woman can at least find one to drool over (after they take those wigs off)? Or is the drama good on its own merits because I really enjoyed it! Now I’m quite pumped about watching the rest of the series even if it’s 20 episodes long.
One teaspoon minced ginger
That's really something.
A very assured and elegant Syrah – 90 points.
You'll see:)
Grapefruit – 4.5 inches
I didn't see much of my dad when I was growing up. He was a successful pianist, band leader and musical arranger and, although he always picked me up from school and that was our special time together, he kept a musician's hours - getting up about 11am and going out to work at about 7pm.
Back in June, I entered the pitch for my book in a contest and won. I was shocked and elated!
when my wife is at mass and his in bed,
In that world every stranger was immediately noticeable as “out of place”.
Scirus' users can search for patents with the same fielded search capabilities. This includes the ability to search the index by title, abstract, author, date and affiliation. Users who require more in-depth patent searches are directed to specialized patent search tools offered through LexisNexis.
Necomimi means Cat ears and Neurowear is a gadget that uses your very own brainwaves to express emotions, so if you have always wanted to be like an anime cat girl it just became a little more possible!
You know how when you have something tough coming up that you have to deal with? You think about it all week, you just want the day to be over with? The day that holds the bad event. And then the day comes, goes and you live through it and go on with your life. That is my day every day. That day will finally be done with when Bear is 18. Till then I just constantly have this twisting feeling in my gut.
Also this sort of discrimination towards sex work and sex workers is very distressing. There ARE consensual sex workers and adult services patrons not allowed to work in peace, who do need the legislature to ensure their adult human rights to a legal and recognized adult services industry or adult services district (red light district). The above insular ‘statement maker’ is talking without doing any research and without any empathy or understanding of other social groups not of their own. Insular and inward thinking, then authoritarian and fundamentalist to boot. Imposing on sex workers and sex industry patrons is disrespectful and deserves condemnation and re-education, is in fact a sign religion or ’3rd world minded society’ induced mental illness, if not mental illness (hate speech crime?) per se. Will the UN and first world, please arbitate and qualify, correct these pharisees.
Omigbodun continues exemplifying the problems that lie underneath and that makes it difficult for us to move forward as a nation. Another example is that of “Seun and his wife” whose major focus is to go abroad since the country is no more pleasant and enjoyable to stay again. One can however agree to stay if he/she wants to remain “dormant: without progressing in life. The picture of how government workers work with their unfriendly voices that echo out in their throats as they attend to visitors. One can see this in the character of Teacher who goes to the Foster Home to see the “vagrants/motherless children”. However, the voice of Mr. Adefola chases her back as he asks what she wants. In the first place, he is not around but later appeared but with an unfriendly voice. Mr Adefola is more or less like a government worker whose behavior serves as threat to anybody who consults him/trying to offer down something- that of the homeless children, an irresponsible fellow.
On my part
That’s a leader.
Yikes, now I know why I procrastinate listing my dolls on Etsy...what a chore!!! I've finally listed everything I have on board, so take a look over at my Etsy shop and buy something!! LOL I haven't set up a PayPal account yet and I know that's important since everyone seems to demand instant gratification, present company included, but again, I'm procrastinating....maybe later on this week. So here's the link or just go to the banner on the right side of my blog. http://www.etsy.com/people/barrobabe?ref=si_pr
i am thankful for:
Olivier, who was in the police van, said, “About 200 m from the police station I noticed the car pulling off the road, but I thought nothing of it. It’s the police after all.”
The threat implied in this outrageous letter was that they were going to publish the replies they got and send all the details to the local and national media. What an outrageous thing – to ask a candidate to sign up to what in effect is a contract to promote multiculturalism if elected.
Unknown (2 salt, 1856)
-Thank you for reading my interview with Northern Iowa LB LJ Fort, I hope you enjoyed it!-
Have fun and linky up!! YAY =D
A love that intertwines with the very air I breathe
Stella Chavez is your classic good girl: straight As, clean-cut boyfriends, and soccer trophies . You’d never guess that Stella’s dad was a drug addict who walked out when she was a kid. Or that inside, Stella wishes for something more.
We stopped a couple of times on the way to take pictures around a place called Rotsund, which seems like a fishing village. I was using a broken camera and could barely get it to work. In the end it didn't matter so much that I hardly had the chance to take any pictures, because it's difficult to make an ugly photograph there.
Cleaning Management
“I am the adopted daughter of Council member Lucian Graymark,” said Clary. “I am close with the Lightwoods of the Insititute. Is it worth earning their wrath and ire just to revenge yourself upon me for tricking you? Besides — I’ve always heard that faeries appreciated cleverness. You wouldn’t want it said that you can’t appreciate a good trick, even at your own expense, would you?”
Read as much as you possibly can.
ever been able to accomplish.
This of course would leave me a little vunerable for a move, having expended move 3's ammo, but I considered that Gerrards too far away to do any real harm at present. however in Stef's turn he did rather well, shooting off several musketeers. On the other flank I fired my advancing firelock armed Dragoons, and fired the muskets of Col Green's Regiment, to the cost of a couple of Lifeguards.
We made the rounds once again of letting everyone I'm not having a baby. That was a joy.
Good acidity and freshness balancing the richness leaving long flavours of pear, peach and toasty spice – 92/100 points.
I have some leftover bits from my Kona challenge classic charm pack--I have a stack of 2 1/2-inch squares that I don't have plans for, so: For this prize, I will baste those squares into 1-inch hexagons before I send them along, and you'll get a rainbow stack of hexagons ready for a project! Just like this one:
Do you even know where you are going?
This brightly colored, soft-set jam is sweet and tart and perfect for spooning over cake, toast or a scone. It fills about 7 half-pint jars, with a bit left over. Just place any extras in a sterilized jar in the fridge and consume it within 3 weeks.
If your rule IS part of your company culture / guiding principles / overal vision… make sure you take some time this week to explain the PURPOSE of it to your team.
Jack developed his morning song
But our car is getting so old and outdated.
�Certainly I can say in my own case it did make a difference.�
So, if fear’s glued you in place on what seems like it should be a little step on the path to one of your goals, don’t worry. You’re normal. Different people get scared by different things. Someone who can bungee jump, might be terrified of the germs they’ll find cleaning the bathroom.
FIONA MAAZEL is the author of the novel Last Last Chance. She is the winner of the Bard Prize for 2009 and a National Book Foundation "5 Under 35" honoree for 2008. Her work has appeared in Review, The New York Times Book Review, Tin House, Salon, n+1, and The Yale Review. She lives in Brooklyn, and her second novel, Woke Up Lonely, will be published by Graywolf Press in the spring of 2013.
On top of all that, I received the Entire Flourishes February Release sets that I won a couple of weeks ago, in the mailbox. I have been anxiously waiting for those sets like crazy! So after I received them, I wondered how many Flourishes stamps I own. So I counted them out and I have: 56!!! I love them all, and I have a hard time choosing which stamps to use every time I go to stamp something out :)
He said that to be hired by the airport, one needed to have passed matric, to have a code eight driver's licence and to have completed an internal three-week basic firefighting course.
I would like to tell them to relax and remember that dogs don’t need to do homework, they don’t need to compete in exams and best of all, they don’t need tuitions or school fees … I want them to understand that dogs are wonderful. (And that I have changed).
What if turns out to be a poor fit?
That’s right, “Up” (no, not the 1976 Russ Meyer film). Maybe it comes as a bit of a surprise, but it surprised me too. I wanted to include at least one Pixar film and “Up” soars above the rest as far as being a fantasy adventure flick. “Up” does so much and recaptured so much of the magic of classic adventure. Carl Fredrickson (Ed Asner) is an elderly widower who never went on the adventures he and his wife had always dreamed of. At the threat of being taken to a nursing home, Mr. Fredrickson ties thousands of balloons to his house (reminiscent of the seagulls fastened to James’ giant peach) and is whisked up, up, and away for the adventure of a lifetime. A young wilderness scout named Russell accidentally tags along and after they brave a treacherous thunderstorm and land in the South American jungle plateau called Paradise Falls the fun really takes off. An army of talking dogs led by Carl’s old hero, the rogue explorer (whom everyone thought a fraud and that he disappeared), Charles Muntz (Christopher Plummer), pursues them. Muntz turns out to be a little different than how Carl had imagined him and is after them for obstructing the capture of the rare giant bird that Russell names Kevin. Carl, disillusioned by how obsessed and unfeeling his old hero has turned out to be, will have to make many sacrifices to save Russell, Kevin, and Dug the dog, and save the day. Biplanes, zeppelins, skeletons of extinct beasts, jungles, balloons, wild animals, and several great chases combine to give this touching and heartfelt film a vigorous pulse. It’s got a great vintage feel, pleasing humor, and a sweet story that is sure to win over the whole family.
My beloved cousin Kerri was the maid of honor in her friend's wedding, and asked me if I would stitch something for her to give as a gift. After a few emails back and forth about what her friend might like, I sent her a few suggestions and this was the one she picked. She liked how it tied into the wedding colors of pink and green and thought it would look beautiful in her friend's house.
I kicked off proceedings with sardines marinées - which were delicious. The Missus opted for ricotta de grand-mere avec tomates confites, which was presented in a glass pot that could have been style-over-substance were it not for the fact the ricotta was creamy and the tomatoes were plump and juicy. Un demi canard avec sauce champignons was next on my eating agenda, and what a delight it was. After ten years in Paris, I've eaten my fair share of canard, but this dish was prepared and presented in an inventive, attractive way. The Missus went with the lamb, which was okay, without being remarkable. For dessert, I couldn't go past the millefeuille aux framboises, a tasty confection of pastry, raspberries and fresh creme anglaise. Mmmmmmm. The Missus allowed herself to be tempted by the pain perdu - which while tasty, was perhaps a little heavy going for an end of meal option.
INSTRUCTIONS FOR INSTALLING A HOME SECURITY SYSTEM
Congrats on one year blog anniversary! I so enjoy following your blog and seeing your wonderful creations! My new favorite color is island indigo. I love any color blue and this color reminds me of being on a tropical island! Thanks so much for the chance to win blog candy! Take care!:-))
"i started running..."
I have rewritten and reread this post many times and I still can’t stop it from sounding a bit gay. But you know what; I’m actually okay with that. In fact, I’m going to test the gayness of this post by adding pink points to the gayest parts (represented by this symbol ) followed up by a rating on my gayometer.
Thank you for stopping by and if you would like to comment that would be great. I hope that you can find the time to pay a visit to my fellow team members, you are bound to find lots of brilliant inspiration.
Week 3/19 - 3/23
I have been blessed by a half brother. He talks to me regularly and supports me with undying love.
I hope you like my photos. Each day has a different theme so I will list those under each shot.
With what sort of a feeling you hope the public leaves after attending a Sigur Rós concert?
“This will be a valuable information tool for parents, staff, students and our communities,” says David Euale, Director of Education for the Halton District School Board. “By adding Twitter to the Halton District School Board’s communications tools, we will be able to communicate in a concise and timely way about issues that are current or evolving.”
I don’t really drink much wheat beer these days; that’s the thing with a gateway, you tend to move on into the house. When I do though, it’s more often than not with food. Wheat beers work really well with desserts I think and one of my favourite combinations is a banana-forward wheat beer with banana pancakes, delicious.
My curiosity took over (YES I KNOW I AM oversocial)
As I received emails not only this week but also during the passed years asking me to tell some more about the painting, I decided to write a post about the artist of these amusing dog portraits.
Toast bread slices. (If making flavored goat cheese, mix it with lemon juice/zest and garlic powder in the meantime.) Spread goat cheese on the toast, and top with bacon, granny smith apple slices, lettuce, and another slice of toast. Enjoy the fiesta on your taste buds!
APRON STRINGS DESIGNS
The Section continues, stating that “disposition under the law of war” is to be interpreted as referring to “detention under the law of war without trial until the end of the hostilities…” This effectively nullifies the Writ of Habeas Corpus, which is applied to all citizens in the Constitution of the United States, and guarantees them a fair and free trial in civilian court. And, of course, the “end of hostilities” is open to debate as well. The “war on terror” is a war declared on an abstract concept, not a nation state or even a particular organization of people, so how and when can it possibly end?
Away to the window I flew like a flash,
I tried to do all of those things and say all of the stuff you're supposed to say when your child is discouraged. She seemed helped by my seemingly wise counsel, and we went about our night.
I’m going to tackle this topic in a fun and unique perspective. Have you ever felt that ecstatic feeling overcome you to let go and dance? Who says we need to hold back in life? Who says we need to be running on “unleaded” when we should have “rocket fuel” running through our veins? Life is too short to sit by not to live an exciting life.
“Loool so she didn’t tell you?” Brandon replied. “Where did you think she was half of Kaye’s rave, feeding the fucking ducks?”
Well I did promise to update you today but I got into the craft room and everything just seemed to work out so it was hard to drag myself away. I will upload some photos tomorrow. Meanwhile this was one of the cards we made in class this week.
legitimate election in 2007, in Kenya. It is the first widespread violence
The consensus in the village is that there is a perfectly innocent reason for the name “Crapstone,” though it is unclear what that is. Theories put forth by various residents the other day included “place of the rocks,” “a kind of twisting of the original word,” “something to do with the soil” and “something to do with Sir Francis Drake,” who lived nearby.
i am learning to live in the struggle. i think that is what stretches and grows us most of the time.
My kids started to do the same and we now enjoy twice daily bike rides.
On the Kuretake blog we're hosting another challenge and this time we've got doodle mania. We're showing doodling techniques using different types of pens by Kuretake and this one below is mine:
And adhered the scalloped cut frame from the card topper, with the help of pop dots from ITSY BITSY, to give the card front & the frame a dimension.....
I understand not wanting to repeat the Palin debacle, and wanting to avoid the appearance of flailing in response to economic headlines. But "building up Romney as a safe and competent alternative to President Barack Obama"? That sounds like the strategy of a dull suitor trying to woo a woman who's involved with a hot, charismatic guy -- "Well, I'll just seem trustworthy and stable, and surely she'll see what a mistake she's made." Does that ever work, outside of movies? Does it ever work in presidential politics? (Can we get Mr. Dukakis on the line?)
I thought carefully what to say.
Jackson, who can be the most compassionate, awesome, caring, funny, wonderful kid, can also be just plain horrible. And, unfortunately, his behavior has gotten worse over the past several weeks. I don't know if it's the meds he's on or what exactly is going on with him right now, but he got so mad at Clayton on Saturday because Clay didn't want to play a game with him, that Jackson ended up trying to beat the snot out of Clay. Thank God I was right there to intervene and I took all the punches and kicks. Sunday, Jackson destroyed the boys' bunkbeds (My friend, Eric, is on bunkbed rebuilding duty), took a knife and cut up his mattress and decapitated some stuffed animals. This morning, again, Jackson got bent out of shape over nothing and tried to strangle Clay, lifting him off the floor with his hands around his throat. Jackson's back in the hospital inpatient again. This is his third admission in a month.
My first objective was the church of St Olave, Hart St. My reason for visiting it was that the sister of one of my husband's ancestors was baptized here in 1794. Once inside I discovered that it had much more important connections than 4xGt Aunt Matilda!
Hmmm, not a true movie buff – I usually can’t even remember the titles, very bad with titles. Beaches with Bette Midler really got a response out of me; I have seen it more than once and cried rivers of tears each time.
There has got to come a point with these restrictor plate tracks where NASCAR takes into consideration what the driver’s feel are the best solutions to provide good racing. But, the NASCAR juggernaut is all about bringing in the $$$ and if Daytona and Talladega don’t provide wreck-for-alls, more seats will become empty and NASCAR won’t be able to fill it’s green belly.
As of the date of implementation of the proposed regulations, applicants for Medicaid coverage of long term care (skilled nursing, supportive living, and the community care and in-home services programs) will be required to account for and document all financial transactions occurring during the five years prior to the date of application, or February 6, 2006, whichever is later.
I've been a good girl too!
What if there were no term limits and Howard Golden remained Borough President? What if Marty Markowitz weren’t so nostalgic for the Dodgers?
The exposure bracketing is often used because is the base to realize HDR (High Dynamic Range) photographs... READ MORE
Have they all gone barking mad?
Is this the song he did the other week? Or is it another one?
The right lesson to take from Apple might be that an economic agenda whose “blueprint begins with American manufacturing” is misguided. South Korea, Taiwan, and China all have us beat as builders of electronics. But the world’s leading mobile electronics maker is headquartered in the United States of America and it’s insanely popular. That’s because the greatest value in the electronics business is in the industrial design, the software engineering, the marketing, and the combination of research and intuition that help you figure out what products people will want. Manufacturing, as a statistical category, is more arbitrary than people realize. There’s no inherently greater virtue in putting tuna into a can . . . than in preparing a seared tuna appetizer . . . . If people aspire to remodel kitchens or teach yoga or treat illness or be hair stylists or be chefs or, God forbid, Internet columnists . . . there’s nothing wrong with that.
The voice of reason gets drowned in the din and bustle of electioneering. Thanks are, however, due to the big shots of Election Commission for enforcing a regimen which cuts out all the crap and gives the voter a fair chance to think himself/herself. For, I consider the wild distractions caused by loud and lurid campaigning an impediment to clear and cogent thinking about the competing ideas and ideologies, policies and programmes.
Looks like we now have a study stating that there is a distinct possibility that retroviruses could have been transmitted via the use of attenuated vaccines.
We humans tend to gravitate to “our people” – either family members or people who align with our views of the world. That is normal and comfortable. But our growth comes from either the stretching that life asks of us or our willingness to choose to go beyond the comfortable. I believe that by making the effort to connect deeply with people who we consider to be “other”, we become more of ourselves and we help to create peace in this world for our children and their children.
Hello! My name is Lula and I would like to welcome you to my blog! This is actually my third blog that I’ve written. I began my first blog livinglula last July as I was preparing myself to turn 40. Soon after my birthday I began to receive scriptures every evening that would just come to my heart. I began to explore them in my second blog Recovered Heart. My second blog was a devotional that I wrote almost every day as a way to communicate with Jesus. I wasn’t really sure how to pray but I found I could express myself freely to Jesus through writing.
“The Fest begins at nine. I hate to call it a workshop. Takes all the romance out of it.” He winked.
Jesus and Lafayette fear for their lives
One word that describes you? Focused
Level 27: MP Cost: 60, Duration: 810 seconds, All Stats: +14%.
Cody wins the match with a Crossroads from Cody. Mark Henry continued to get closer to ringside to distract Orton, and after the match, Mark laid out Randy and grabbed the World Title, saying this is what it’s about.
Excuse me for being a bit remiss on my blogging as of late - between work, prepping for the holidays, a quick getaway to California, and an untimely head cold which became a bronchitis, I've not had much time for anything! I'm actually sitting in the Atlanta airport right now as we speak.... finally, a moment to sit down!
This makes draws very unattractive, but in doing so penalises those that were due to a hard-fought game timing out. Those innocent of cautious or slow play are punished along with the guilty.
The United States are a country constantly searching for history. One needs watch only a couple of the newer Scorsese films like "Gangs of New York" or "The Aviator" to see the great pains their psyche goes through to evangelize and invent upon some would say paltry two hundred years of recent activity. A country of immigrants trying to do the world one better: let's invent the perfect nation.
We did the Faces of Easter 1and 2 this morning. This was my first time using this material and I was extremely impressed with the wondering time which allows the children to help tell the story with items they see in the classroom.
Although the independence anniversary has come and gone, the penchant for urban renewal remains strong. In February, Dushanbe authorities published a list of several dozen buildings located along the so-called “protocol highway” – on which President Imomali Rahmon and other senior officials drive to work – that have been designated for demolition. Many of these buildings are solid apartment blocks that are home to several thousand people. Officials are mum on kind of compensation owners can anticipate, and residents expect to be moved to the distant suburbs: they’ve seen the relentless development approaching for years, including high-rise, “elite” apartments in their neighborhood.
Display my button on your sidebar if you don't already (thanks to everyone that has it, it gives me such a warm gooey feeling to see it!)
Neither team played its strongest soccer of the season, in what amounted to sloppy game. Scoring opportunities were rare, and, more often than not, went to waste.
The chill of the night made my body stiff like a log. I did not feel parched or hungry even after twenty hours of starvation. In fact I did not feel anything.
1. Successfully complete the BluePrint Cleanse. This will start Monday April 2nd and end Tuesday April 10th. A+: This went very very well and I want to do it again. You can check out the recap here for more information. I honestly felt wonderful and I wish I could do if for life because I had almost no knee pain! I also managed to keep a total of 5lbs off this month which if you have been following is a huge success for me!
In his acceptance speech during the Golden Globe Awards ceremony, Farhadi said Iranians are “truly a peace-loving people.”
Music has always been one thing that I've enjoyed most. Never played anything, but just listening soothes my soul. I LOVE LOVE LOVE Tupac. When people have asked me in the past "Why do u like him?" I didn't really know why? Why do you like the music you like?? You just do, right? Well I've been thinking a lot about music as it's (at times) becoming a little difficult to listen sometimes. I've noticed that I get emotional more easily since we lost G, and if a song touches me, even a little, I WILL CRY. LOL. But I have been thinking the most about why I do like the music I do.
Due to it’s size it would not fit in my suitcase so they greatfully shipped it and it arrived recently!
dragged into a sugarcane field by a 15-year-old fellow schoolboy who
But when lots of people are already now talking about a bubble, what will they do in two or three years from now?
A quick note that things with my novel have been going great, and so far some 14,000 people have downloaded the Kindle edition. If you enjoy my reviews and articles, then you may want to check out the book – it’s been getting a lot of really good discussion and reviews.
I was walking home last night and I tried to picture it in my mind: if all the electricity shut down, right there at 26th and 3rd, while I was going home. 7PM. New York City. Not just the traffic lights and the stores and the restaurants. All the cars would coast and crash to a stop (because spark plugs stop working). What the people of New York would notice most though would be their phones and blackberries and iPads would go black all at once.
It has been pouring non-stop since last night and it has created the perfect Sunday ambiance. I left the window open all night and am still lounging in bed listening to the birds and the gentle fall of the rain. Today I hope to do a little more unpacking and settling in, to write a bit, to bake something, to stock up for the week at the store, and to generally relax and organize for a successful week ahead.
Better, I think, to be a little loosey-goosey with this stuff. If you be yourself, a little quirky, a little original, yes, you might turn somebody off. But you have a far better chance of attracting a kindred agent spirit I think, the one that loves your letter and then loves your work. Again, please don't take this as carte blanche to ignore all the advice you've ever heard when it comes to query letters. But do take it as permission to relax a little, have some fun, and yes, let your query freak flag fly.
But what shall we do with this premise, in the end? Is slavery immoral? It must first be said that there are different kinds of slavery, as I already alluded to. In different times and places, slavery has taken on different forms. The type of slavery we most often think of and most readily condemn is called chattel slavery. This is the kind of slavery through which blacks were taken from Africa, packed into ships, and forced to work on plantations in the New World. A fair number of white Europeans, Asians, and indigenous peoples were also slaves or at least indentured servants. Black slaves were the worst off because of the spread of racist ideology.
Look for groups in your community that focus on helping or educating women about finances or retirement planning. Go to the library and research financial/retirement planning. You have to start somewhere and education is the best first step.
